
    Welcome to Personal Paint!

    Thank you for choosing Personal Paint.

    If you are using a copy of the program, please support  our  continued
    Amiga software development efforts by purchasing the original package.

    Your Cloanto Team



    Have you remembered...

    ...  To  make  a backup copy of the disks? A backup copy gives you the
    freedom to experiment with the software without risk of data-loss.

    ... To mail the registration card? Registered users are  eligible  for
    upgrades to new versions of the program.



    Cloanto is also on the World Wide Web and on Aminet

    To  get  the  latest  news  and  support  files, visit our web site at
    <http://www.cloanto.com>, or check the Cloanto section on  Aminet,  in
    <biz/cloan>.



    0. User Guide Supplement

    Since  the  publication of the original User Guide, Personal Paint has
    gone through  major  improvements.  We  thank  all  users  of  Cloanto
    products for their support and feedback.

    This  supplement  describes new program features. Sections are ordered
    as they appear in the original manual and in the software menus (a '<'
    sign  is used to mark section numbers which have been inserted between
    existing sections).

    New features of Personal Paint include:

    - Animation (featuring a storyboard,  superior  compression,  multiple
    palettes,   frame-by-frame  timing,  ANIM-5/7/8  and  hybrid  formats,
    anim-brushes etc.), including animation on RTG display cards (with  or
    without double-buffering).

    -  New  and  improved  file  formats,  including  PhotoCD (licensed by
    Kodak), GIF (licensed by Unisys), BMP (Windows and OS/2), JPEG (not  a
    DataType any more), 24-bit DataTypes and PBM

    -  Professional  Internet  features like GIF animations, a map editor,
    and everything needed to achieve maximum image quality  in  a  compact
    size

    -  Enhanced  user  interface  (pop-up gadgets, different sizes of user
    interface fonts, NewIcons thumbnails, etc.)

    - 180 ARexx  commands,  with  scripts  directly  accessible  from  the
    toolbar

    -  New  "plug-in" library system makes it possible to add input/output
    formats (for files, scanners, screens, etc.) and to  replace  critical
    Amiga blitter and CPU code with a combination of "virtual blitter" and
    other logic fully  exploiting  the  different  configurations  (68040,
    PowerPC, etc.)

    - Automatically create directory thumbnails for entire directories

    - Advanced vector text functions (rotate, antialias, paths, etc.)

    -  Sophisticated  "behind  the  scenes"  memory  management, including
    virtual memory (swaps  inactive  image  data  to  Fast  RAM  and  disk
    storage) and multiple levels of undo and redo

    -  New,  faster  image  processing  effects, including transparencies,
    alpha channel and single image  stereograms  (both  SIRDS  and  custom
    pattern stereograms, as in "Magic Eye")

    -  Support  of  Retargetable Graphics (display cards like the Picasso,
    Retina, Piccolo, Rainbow, EGS, CyberGraphX etc.)

    - Direct, high quality 24-bit printing (Color and Black &  White)  and
    interface to third-party software such as Studio Print Server

    -  Professional  and  fast  modes for converting 24-bit pictures (IFF,
    PNG, PCX, PBM etc.) to 256 colors or less

    - HAM, HAM8, Picasso and CyberGraphX 24-bit viewer active during color
    reduction

    -  First  paint  program  worldwide  to  support the new PNG (Portable
    Network Graphics) file format

    - Support and editing of IFF, PNG and GIF project annotations (Author,
    Copyright and Comment fields, plus Amiga filenotes)

    - Autoscroll painting

    - Workbench Application Icon (Drag and Drop)

    - ASL-compatible file requester

    - More power through machine language code: the software is in part up
    to 500% faster

    - A collection of utilities, including color  fonts  and  new  DeskJet
    printer drivers (up to four inks)


    1.2 System Configuration

    On systems having only one Mbyte of total RAM, newer versions  of  the
    Amiga  operating  system  (e.g. version 3) and certain custom software
    and hardware configurations (e.g. permanently  resident  utilities  or
    multiple  floppy  disk  drives)  occupy  more memory than the original
    system configuration, and may leave insufficient free  memory  to  run
    Personal  Paint.  If  this  is  the case, an attempt should be made to
    install  Personal  Paint  to  hard  disk  or  floppy  disk  with   the
    "decompress"  option  of  the  installation procedure enabled (section
    1.13.1). The decompressed version  of  the  software  uses  more  disk
    space,  but  requires  less  RAM  during  loading. In general, 1 Mbyte
    systems benefit more by  an  inexpensive  RAM  expansion  than  by  an
    upgrade to a newer and more memory consuming operating system.


    1.3.5 Virtual Memory

    The term "Virtual memory" is associated with the ability to address  a
    storage  space  much  larger  than  the  RAM normally available on the
    computer. Personal Paint can use both Fast RAM and/or  disk  space  to
    store image data which would normally occupy a more "precious" type of
    RAM (e.g. Chip RAM). Provided that enough Fast RAM and/or  disk  space
    are available, Personal Paint can temporarily move all unused items to
    a secondary storage location. The main items which may be  moved  are:
    images,   animations,   brushes,   transparency  and  stencil  planes,
    storyboard, environment and brush undo buffers.  Personal  Paint  only
    moves  an object to virtual memory if it is not "active", that is, the
    item must not be currently displayed or processed. Enough Chip  memory
    must  still be available for the current screen, the current image (or
    animation frame) and the current brush. Functions such as Color  Merge
    may temporarily need to access more objects.

    The  Memory  Information requester (section 4.11) indicates the amount
    of virtual memory currently in use and allows  the  user  to  manually
    move data to virtual memory.

    The  Settings  menu  gives  access  to the Memory Management requester
    (section 8.<3), which allows the user to switch RAM and/or disk  based
    virtual memory on or off.


    1.9.4 Gadgets

    Underlined  characters  indicate  keyboard   shortcuts   to   gadgets.
    Additional  new  features are described in section 1.14 (External User
    Interface Files) and appendix B (Command Shortcuts).


    1.10.4 The <Shift> Keys

    Section 8.9.3 describes how to use the <Shift> key to create Workbench
    icons in up to 256 colors. Section <6.9 explains how to use <Shift> to
    apply  a  single  color  palette  when color-reducing an animation. If
    <Shift> is held down while an animation file is  dragged  and  dropped
    over  the  Personal  Paint  application  icon,  the  file will be only
    played, and not loaded.


    1.12 Configuring and Loading Personal Paint

    The  program  disk is no longer bootable. Wide diffusion of different,
    new versions of the Amiga operating system on different machines  made
    it impractical to use Workbench 1.3 as a common denominator to boot on
    all systems. Optional additional disks may  still  be  used  to  store
    picture and animation files. The install routine can copy these to the
    hard disk as requested.

    Personal Paint fully supports Amiga  Application  Icons  (  drag  and
    drop  ).  This  means that whenever the program is loaded on a system
    running at least version 2.0 of the operating system, a small "PPaint"
    icon  (AppIcon) appears on the Workbench (the text under the icon also
    indicates the name  of  Personal  Paint's  ARexx  port).  The  program
    automatically  loads any image and animation files dragged and dropped
    over the application icon. If <Shift> is held down while an  animation
    is dropped over the icon, the animation is only played - not loaded. A
    simple double-click on the icon brings Personal Paint to the front  of
    all screens.

    The  "PPaint:PPaint_Icons" drawer contains additional icon description
    files, which can be modified by the user: "def_AppIcon", "def_Drawer",
    "def_Animation" and "def_AnimBrush".

    While  "PPaint:PPaint_Prefs"  remains the default location for storing
    settings  files,  during  startup  Personal  Paint  also   scans   the
    "ENV:PPaint"  drawer  (if it exists). Any files stored in "ENV:PPaint"
    have a higher priority than those in "PPaint:PPaint_Prefs".

    The use of Amiga environment variables is especially useful when it is
    not  possible  to write to the application storage medium, for example
    if Personal Paint is run from a CD-ROM. To make these changes  persist
    after the computer is reset, they must be stored in "ENVARC:PPaint".


    1.13.1 Automatic Installation: The InstallPPaint Program

    The  Amiga  Installer  program  is  used  to  install  the   software.
    Context-sensitive  help  is  available  on-line by pressing the <Help>
    key.


    1.14 External User Interface Files

    All user interface pictures (tools, gadget images, etc.) are stored in
    a  separate  and  editable   file   named   "UIGraphics.pic"   (inside
    "PPaint_Prefs").

    The  file  may  be stored in PNG format to reduce disk occupation. For
    faster program loading after hard disk installation, it can be  loaded
    as a brush and saved again using the IFF-ILBM format.

    The  user  interface  text  files  (UIText.  xxx ) contain a version
    number, used to identify the release version of the  text  file.  This
    number  is  read by Personal Paint, and should normally not be changed
    by the user.

    The underscore character can be used in sections  TXW  (window  texts)
    and TXG (gadget texts) of the user interface text files. The character
    following the underscore will be underlined and  used  as  a  keyboard
    shortcut, in accordance with the Amiga user interface specifications.

    Supported  gadget  types  are:  cycle  gadgets,  checkboxes,  sliders,
    listviews (scrollboxes) and action gadget texts (e.g. "_OK").

    When input by the user, lower case  letters  are  treated  differently
    than  capitals  in  cycle gadgets, proportional gadgets and listviews.
    The former force the gadget to "go forward", while the latter make  it
    "go  back".  In  other  gadget types, upper and lower case letters are
    treated as identical.

    Due to the new Animation features, more menus have to share  the  same
    horizontal  screen  space.  The  underscore  character  can be used to
    indicate where a menu title text  can  be  abbreviated  (this  may  be
    necessary  when  using  low-resolution screen modes). For example, the
    program could abbreviate  "Anim_ation"  to  "Anim.",  should  this  be
    necessary.   Otherwise,   the   menu   would   be  displayed  normally
    ("Animation").


    2.7 File Formats

    Personal  Paint  and  other Cloanto programs use external input/output
    modules to read and save data in different file formats.  I/O  modules
    can  be  added  to  extend  the  software  without  replacing the main
    program. The modules are standard Amiga libraries, which can be stored
    either  in  LIBS:  or  in the local directory (e.g. "PPaint:libs"). If
    libraries exist in both places, the software determines which  library
    is newer, and uses it.

    Each  library  may support more than one file format. Some formats may
    be available only as read  formats  or  only  as  write  formats.  For
    example,  images  can  be written as C source code, but they cannot be
    read back from that format (a C compiler would be able to process such
    a file). The Plasma module instead, generates synthetic images, and is
    only an input module.

    Some libraries have configuration options which can be set by the user
    from  the  file  requester, or through the ARexx programming interface
    (appendix E). By default, it is  not  necessary  to  change  the  file
    format   options,   which   are  preset  in  a  way  which  guarantees
    compatibility, efficiency and processing speed. When a file  is  saved
    in  the  same  format  in which it was loaded, the settings originally
    associated  to  the  file  format  are  preserved  (unless  they   are
    explicitly  changed). For example, if an IFF-ILBM image without screen
    mode information is loaded and edited, it is then saved  back  without
    this information.

    ILBM,  PNG,  GIF  and  other  file formats usually employ 24-bit color
    palettes, but not all non-AGA Amiga screen modes have a  24-bit  color
    resolution. Personal Paint always encodes palette colors using 24-bits
    ("true color") for higher quality, but colors may be  rounded  to  the
    closest Amiga color step (12 bits, i.e. 4 bits for each Red, Green and
    Blue component, on original Amiga architectures) when they are  copied
    into  the  environment  palette. In order not to lose color resolution
    when  loading  an  image  and  saving  it  again,  please   read   the
    instructions  in  sections  2.8  and C.3 (Read-Only Settings: REDBITS,
    GREENBITS, BLUEBITS). This does not apply to  brushes,  which  can  be
    loaded  and  saved  without  changes  to  the  palette  granularity by
    Personal Paint, regardless of the current video mode color resolution.

    It should be kept in mind  that  Personal  Paint  is  a  palette-based
    program  which  can  perform  professional conversions from true color
    (24/48-bit) data to palette images, but it cannot save back using true
    color  formats  such  as  JPEG  (or  true-color-mode  PNG, PCX, IFF or
    others), the only exception being true color (8-bit) grayscale  images
    which  can  be  edited  as  palette-based  images (up to 256 levels of
    gray), and saved as true color images in formats such as PNG.

    When loading a file, the "AUTO" file format option indicates that  the
    file  format should be detected automatically. If more than one loader
    exists for a specific file format (e.g. DataTypes, SuperView and/or  a
    specific  Cloanto I/O module), it may be useful to manually select the
    preferred loader. Otherwise, the first loader from the top of the list
    which recognizes the format is used.

    The  following sections list various file formats supported by the I/O
    modules which can be used with Personal Paint. Options  are  explained
    only  once,  even when they are common to several formats. Section 2.8
    ("Personal Paint for Authors") of this tutorial chapter explains  some
    practical applications of the various formats.


    2.7.1 IFF ILBM

    IFF ILBM (from "Interchange File Format - InterLeaved BitMap") is  the
    Amiga standard format. It is very fast, and compatible with most Amiga
    applications, although it does not compress as well as PNG and GIF.

    This format supports stencils and transparencies. If a stencil  (color
    mask,  section  7.2)  is  active, it is saved with the image. The ILBM
    format is also capable of storing 24-bit data and Amiga HAM  and  HAM8
    images,  which  Personal  Paint can load. Comments (Author, Copyright,
    Annotation) are also supported.

    Options include Compression (activates or  disables  compression)  and
    Screen  Format  (specifies  whether  to save screen format information
    with the image).


    2.7.2 PNG

    The  PNG (Portable Network Graphics) format is the newest and the most
    advanced of all the formats  supported  by  Personal  Paint.  Personal
    Paint was the first paint program worldwide to support PNG. PNG offers
    the  best  compression  of  all  file  formats,   and   manages   both
    palette-based  and  true  color  (up  to 48-bit) images. PNG can store
    transparency information, as well as comments.

    The Automatic option determines whether the library should  check  the
    palette  and  determine if it is a grayscale palette, and only in that
    case automatically save the image in a special grayscale type of  PNG,
    which  is  more  efficient.  An  image  is considered grayscale if the
    palette contains 2, 4, 16 or  256  entries  being  a  perfect  set  of
    black-to-white shades.

    The Progressive Display option means that the image is stored in a way
    as to support progressive display during load. This increases the file
    size, but allows for some types of mostly online (Internet) viewers to
    allow for a preview which is raw at the beginning,  and  progressively
    more and more detailed.

    The compression level can be set from minimum (one) to maximum (nine).
    The maximum compression level takes longer to compress,  but  it  does
    not affect decompression.


    2.7.3 GIF

    GIF (Graphics Interchange Format, officially pronounced  "jif")  is  a
    very well-established graphics format, especially on the Internet. Its
    popularity is only menaced by patent issues which make it necessary to
    pay  a  royalty  to  Unisys Corporation for each piece of GIF software
    sold. For this reason, the GIF input/output library  is  not  included
    with  all versions of Personal Paint, especially those manufactured by
    third parties under license from Cloanto.

    GIF compresses much better than ILBM, and almost as well  as  PNG.  It
    cannot store true color data.

    The  GIF  library  includes an option to select between the GIF87a and
    the  GIF89a  specification.  GIF89a  supports  comments,  transparency
    information,  and animation. The Frame load option allows the user (or
    Rexx client) to specify a specific animation frame to be loaded.


    2.7.4 BMP

    The library included with Personal Paint supports both the Windows and
    the OS/2 version of the BMP (BitMaP) format.

    This format supports palette-based and 24-bit true color  images.  The
    Windows variant supports two types of compression (RLE4 and RLE8, used
    for images having more than  16  colors),  but  not  all  BMP  loaders
    support compression.


    2.7.5 PCX

    PCX (ZSoft Paintbrush File Format) is the format originally  preferred
    by  simple  MS-DOS  paint  and  scanner programs. This format supports
    palette-based and 24-bit data.

    Internally, different PCX subformats are used in order to achieve best
    compatibility  with existing PC systems. Two-color images are saved as
    CGA monochrome files. In this format, a few image loaders  may  assume
    color  0 to be black, and color 1 to be white. In such a case, the two
    colors  should  be  exchanged  in  Personal  Paint's  palette   before
    remapping  (section  7.3)  and saving the picture. Images with 4 or 16
    colors are stored as EGA/VGA 16-color files (adding extra empty planes
    if  necessary).  Images  with  more colors are stored as 256-color VGA
    files.

    The  Compatibility  option,  required  to  exchange  data  with   some
    programs,  forces  the  library  to only use a rigid set of PC palette
    sizes, and add unused colors if the image has an  intermediate  number
    of color entries.


    2.7.6 IFF ACBM

    ACBM is an acronym of "Amiga Contiguous BitMap format". This is an old
    IFF format similar to ILBM, only that it is not compressed.


    2.7.7 Encrypted

    The  Encrypted  format  is  useful  to  protect  "private"   pictures.
    Encrypted  images  are  modified  using  a  key. If the picture is not
    loaded using the same encryption key, it will be  unreadable.  Section
    8.3  has  more information on encryption in general, and describes the
    requester  used  to  define  the   encryption   key.   The   requester
    automatically  pops  up  when  an  encrypted  file  is  loaded  and no
    encryption key is set, or if the key was set and cancelled. Otherwise,
    the  previously used encryption key is considered valid. The file name
    is not encrypted.

    The encrypted format should not be used, imported  or  exported  where
    doing so would be illegal.


    2.7.8 PBM

    The PBM (Portable BitMap, for black and white images) format  and  the
    closely-related   PGM  (Portable  GrayMap,  for  grayscales)  and  PPM
    (Portable PixMap, 24-bit images) are part  of  a  popular  (especially
    some  time  ago),  mainly  freely  disributable, set of conversion and
    image processing tools. Personal  Paint's  PBM  library  supports  all
    three  formats,  each  of  them  both  in  the binary and in the ASCII
    variant  (Binary  option).  Data  stored  in  these  formats  is   not
    compressed.

    If  the  Automatic option is disabled, images are always stored in the
    PPM (24-bit) format. Otherwise, the software automatically detects the
    best format, based on the image format.


    2.7.9 Raw

    This  format  was  designed  for  Amiga  game  developers  and   other
    programmers asking for a quick and informal way to incorporate bitmaps
    into their code.

    The Colors option can be set to 0 to save only the image data, to 1 to
    save  the palette data followed by the image data, or to 2 to save the
    image data followd by the palette data.  The  image  data  is  written
    bitplane  after  bitplane  (each data-row is WORD-padded). The palette
    data consists of three bytes (RGB) for each palette entry.


    2.7.10 C Source Code (Save Only)

    The  C  source  code  format is suitable for embedding image data into
    Amiga C graphics programming environments.

    C   source   code   files   also    contain    a    filled-in    Amiga
    DrawImage()-compatible  Image  structure and arrays with color palette
    data in formats suitable for both LoadRGB4() and  LoadRGB32().  Unused
    bitplanes  are  not  output  as  data,  but  marked in the appropriate
    PlanePick and PlaneOnOff fields. The image array data type is  defined
    as  "UWORD chip". The "chip" keyword is used by some compilers to make
    sure that the data is loaded in Amiga Chip RAM at run time. It may  be
    necessary  to  remove  it,  or  modify  it into a different name (e.g.
    "__chip").


    2.7.11 ASCII (Save Only)

    This is a simple "text art" format.

    The  Width  and  Height parameters, in the range 0..32767 indicate the
    number of characters per row and column, respectively. If one  of  the
    two  values  is  0, then it is adjusted to a size in proportion to the
    other value, in consideration of the image aspect. If both are set  to
    0, then the width is adjusted to 80.

    The  Gray  Shades string contains a variable number of characters used
    to render the different levels of gray,  from  black  to  white  (e.g.
    "#@08Oo+=-:. "). The more characters there are in the string, the more
    shades will be used to render the image.


    2.7.12 JPEG Format (Load Only)

    The  JPEG  (Joint  Photographic  Experts  Group)  is  a sophisticated,
    highly-compressible (and  lossy , meaning that the original image is
    not  preserved)  format  to  render true color images. It cannot store
    palette-based  images,  and  it  is  not  suitable  to  render   sharp
    contrasts. It is ideal for "real life" images.

    The  Quality  load  option  activates  a  fast  and  not very accurate
    algorithm (DCT/IDCT) if set to 0, or  a  higher-quality  (but  slower)
    "fancy upsampling" procedure if set to 1. If the Gray Shades option is
    enabled, the image is converted to  a  grayscale  picture  during  the
    load.  The Format setting determines whether the image is to be loaded
    in its original format (Format = 0), or reduced to  1/2,  1/4  or  1/8
    (Format  values of 1, 2 and 3, respectively) of its original width and
    height.


    2.7.13 Photo CD (Load Only)

    This  is a Photo CD implementation licensed from Kodak. Personal Paint
    can load 24-bit images, as well as rotated images.

    Please note that on a standard Photo CD CD-ROM, pictures  are  usually
    stored  in  a  directory named "Photo_cd/Images". The files have names
    like "Img0001.pcd", "Img0002.pcd", etc.

    Format values in the range  1..5  respectively  select  the  following
    image formats:

    1:  192 × 128  (BASE16)
    2:  384 × 256  (BASE4)
    3:  768 × 512  (BASE)
    4: 1536 × 1024 (4BASE)
    5: 3072 × 2048 (16BASE)

    Setting Gray Shades to 1 forces a grayscale conversion.

    The Photo CD implementation includes two loaders. In addition  to  the
    normal image loader, a "Photo CD Overview" loader (short: "PCD-OV") is
    used  to  load  the  thumbnail  images  showing  miniatures   of   the
    photographs.   On   standard  Photo  CDs,  these  are  stored  in  the
    "Photo_cd/Overview.pcd" file.

    A Format value of 1 or 2 respectively selects the 96 × 96 (1)  or  the
    192  ×  192  (2) thumbnail format. The Columns value (range: 1..32767)
    sets the numer of images per row.


    2.7.14 DataTypes (Load Only)

    This  I/O  module  acts  as  an interface to load any type of pictures
    supported by the Amiga DataTypes. Both palette-based  and  true  color
    images are supported (picture.datatype version 43).


    2.7.15 Plasma (Load Only)

    Plasma is not strictly a loader, but rather  a  generator  of  fractal
    images. This library uses a variety of parameters.

    Width:  width  of the image to be created; if 0, the current image (or
    brush) format (width and height) is used.

    Height: height of the image to be created; if 0, the  image  or  brush
    format is used.

    Colors:  number  of  colors of the image to be created (4..256 colors,
    i.e. depth 2..8); if both Width and Height are  set  to  0,  then  the
    image (or brush) depth is used.

    Graininess: image "graininess" in 1/10000 (range 5000..500000, default
    20000).

    Random Seed: random seed; if negative, totally random  image  palettes
    are generated.

    Gray  Shades:  color  (0) or grayscale (1) palette; gray images can be
    useful as alpha channel information.


    2.7.16 Scanner (Load Only)

    A  scanner  I/O  library is not normally supplied with Personal Paint,
    but it is rather provided  with  products  such  as  ScanQuix.  It  is
    mentioned  here  mainly  to  draw  attention  to the fact that the I/O
    modules allow for capabilities which go beyond simple file I/O.


    2.8 Personal Paint for Authors

    Personal  Paint offers a unique range of features designed for authors
    of artwork to be distributed on computer files. In  this  section,  we
    would  like  to  share  with  you  some of the experience collected by
    leading artists. We also explain some of the settings  we  at  Cloanto
    prefer in our own configurations.

    An  image  or  an  animation  created with public distribution in mind
    requires some considerations which are normally not  relevant  when  a
    file is used only on the author's computer.

    As  the  public grows wider, compatibility becomes an issue: the image
    or the animation may have been created using a screen  mode  different
    than what a viewer may have available. Some (especially older) picture
    and animation players had  limitations  and  bugs,  and  it  could  be
    interesting  to  have access to a range of options designed to prevent
    potential difficulties before they become a problem for end users.

    Associating information such as author, copyright, and other  comments
    to  files is usually appreciated both by authors and by the public (as
    well as by possible publishers). Also, there should be no difficulties
    or   formalities   in  distributing  the  icons  created  by  the  art
    application, or even replacing these with new default icons. Both  the
    icons  and  the  image  file  should  be  product-neutral  (no  hidden
    advertising  texts  inside  the  file).  After  more  than  six  major
    versions,  Personal Paint offers experienced answers to these and many
    more requirements.

    Most computing platforms use display modes made of square pixels (i.e.
    an  X/Y  ratio  of  1,  as  on the Macintosh, or on the PC's VGA) as a
    standard. This means that the pixels are exactly as tall as  they  are
    wide.  To  be  round, a circle drawn on such a screen would be as wide
    (in pixels) as  it  is  tall.  Not  so  on  the  Amiga.  The  original
    non-interlaced  Amiga  modes  had  a  ratio  close  to  0.5 (so-called
    "tall-pixels"). A "round" circle could be 10 pixels on the X-axis  and
    5  pixels  on  the  Y-axis.  Most  artists  prefer to work with square
    pixels. Yet even here there is no exact match on the  Amiga.  PAL  and
    NTSC  screen  modes,  for  example,  have pixels of slightly different
    ratios. Before it draws a circle, Personal  Paint  queries  the  Amiga
    Display  Database to obtain information on the ratio. For example, the
    Display Database could tell Personal Paint that a "round" circle  must
    be  10 pixels wide and... 9 pixels tall. This is not what most artists
    want. Rather than working with similar approximations, at  Cloanto  we
    prefer  to  activate  the  Square Pixels option (section 8.13.5). This
    ensures that the resulting images appear correctly when  viewed  using
    1:1  pixels,  regardless  of  the  screen  mode in which the image was
    created.

    Normally,  when  storing  an  image  in  formats  such  as   IFF-ILBM,
    information  about  the  current  screen  mode is also saved. When the
    Amiga was first released,  associating  a  screen  mode  to  an  image
    allowed  simple  viewer  applications  to quickly open a screen of the
    same type as the one used by the author. At that  time,  options  were
    limited:  screens  could  be either low resolution or high resolution,
    interlaced or non-interlaced. These were common to all  Amigas.  Minor
    difficulties  would  result from images crossing the oceans separating
    PAL from NTSC  video  modes.  Today,  there  are  not  only  different
    generations  of  Amiga display hardware, but even third-party graphics
    boards. Even users of identical Amiga  computers  may  have  installed
    different  Monitor files on their systems (section 10.4). Furthermore,
    applications became more intelligent:  Personal  Paint,  for  example,
    excels  in  automatically  picking  the  best available screen mode to
    display an image.

    Over the years, associating  default  screen  modes  to  pictures  has
    become  more dangerous (the default may not be available, or viewable,
    on  the  user's  machine)  and  less  necessary  (software   is   more
    intelligent).  At  Cloanto,  we now prefer to store all images without
    associating a default screen mode to the file. To switch this  option,
    open  the Options window in the Save Image requester (section 4.2) and
    clear the Screen Format setting. File formats which cannot save screen
    mode information (e.g. PBM) do not have this option.

    Animations  require  some additional attention. In accordance with the
    different Amiga ANIM  specifications  (standards  for  animation  file
    formats),  a  default  screen  mode  must  be  specified  in the file.
    Personal Paint and the most used Amiga animation players  are  capable
    of  overriding  this  information  when  loading an animation, and can
    automatically select an appropriate screen mode just as Personal Paint
    does  for  images. This is necessary, for example, when an animation's
    default mode is not supported on the computer where the  animation  is
    to  be  played.  Nevertheless, when an animation is saved, the current
    screen mode is always stored with the animation. At Cloanto,  we  have
    decided to associate "DblPAL" screen modes to the animations we create
    and distribute. These screen modes are supported by all AGA  machines,
    and  can  be  displayed  on  VGA monitors not supporting 15 kHz modes.
    Furthermore, the pixel X/Y ratio of PAL is  closer  than  NTSC  to  1,
    which  is  preferred  by most artists. The AGA chip-set is very common
    among the more active Amiga users. Yet even if the end user's  machine
    does  not  support  DblPAL,  the  animation  can be displayed in other
    screen modes (the screen mode information is only a hint  required  by
    the ANIM standard, not an imperative for applications).

    Users  of  original  and ECS Amiga chip-sets, as well as users of some
    display cards such as the Picasso II should  consider  another  issue:
    color  resolution. AGA allows users and applications to define and set
    colors using 8 bits per color component (red, green and blue). This is
    24  bits  (or  256  gray-levels,  or  more  than  16 million different
    color-combinations). Older Amigas only support 4  bits  per  component
    (i.e.  16 gray-levels, or 4096 colors). The Picasso II uses 6 bits per
    component (64 gray levels, or 262 144 colors). This means that on some
    systems  colors  cannot  be defined with the precision possible on AGA
    (e.g. on the Amiga 1200 and 4000),  for  example.  Users  of  Personal
    Paint can quickly check the color resolution of a given screen mode by
    displaying the Palette  requester  (section  7.1.3)  and  setting  any
    color-slider  to  the  maximum.  The  numerical  value  indicates  the
    precision of the display (e.g. a maximum level of 15, 63 or 255  would
    indicate  that  the  hardware  supports  16, 64 or 256 levels for that
    color component).

    When a palette is loaded on a system with a lower color resolution,  a
    majority of colors is likely to "snap" to coarser levels. If the image
    is then saved again, a loss of data may occur. As an artist,  you  may
    want  to  make  sure  that  the  colors you see on your system will be
    loaded and represented the same way by an older Amiga. Or, even if you
    do  not  own  a system capable of handling 8 bits per color component,
    you may  need  to  edit  images  in  that  resolution  without  losing
    precision. Personal Paint offers a solution to all these requirements,
    by allowing the user to manually set the color  precision  (number  of
    bits per color component). Even if this is different (higher or lower)
    than what is supported by the system, Personal Paint can use a  custom
    value  for all processing, overriding the Amiga defaults. As explained
    in section C.3, when  the  program  settings  REDBITS,  GREENBITS  and
    BLUEBITS  are  set  to  0,  Personal  Paint  uses  the  maximum  color
    resolution supported by the video device currently used. This  is  the
    program's  default. Other values, however, force Personal Paint to use
    specific numbers of bits per color component. For example, setting all
    three  values  to  8  allows  for  precise  editing  of AGA-resolution
    palettes even on ECS or Picasso II systems.

    At Cloanto, where we work with different Amiga computers  and  graphic
    boards,  we  manually  set REDBITS, GREENBITS and BLUEBITS to 8 in our
    own startup files. If you have an AGA computer and you  only  work  in
    AGA screen modes, you should not need to set these values yourself (by
    default this is taken care of by Personal Paint), unless you  want  to
    emulate a coarser color resolution.

    When  we  save  an image, at Cloanto we use the IFF-ILBM format if the
    image is mainly for Amiga distribution. The options  we  normally  set
    are: compression active, no screen format information. IFF-ILBM is the
    most supported Amiga image file  format,  and  also  offers  excellent
    loading   and   saving  times  (e.g.  viewers  are  faster),  but  its
    compression is not as good as in other formats  (i.e.  the  files  are
    longer).  When  space  is  really tight and excellent compression is a
    priority, we use PNG (options: compression  level  9,  no  progressive
    display,  automatic  mode  enabled).  Setting  a PNG compression level
    higher than 6 slightly improves compression,  but  considerably  slows
    down  the compression procedure. PNG is also our format of choice when
    the images are to be read by other computers. We used  to  prefer  GIF
    for  cross-platform  distribution, but GIF's popularity was suffocated
    at the end of 1994, after Unisys Corporation began demanding royalties
    for  software  reading  and  writing GIF (and TIFF/LZW) files. When we
    write images to be used  on  an  Amiga  CD-ROM,  we  sometimes  prefer
    another  format:  uncompressed  IFF-ILBM  (no  compression,  no screen
    format information). This can generate quite  long  files,  but  on  a
    CD-ROM  space  is  usually  not a problem. Due to the minimum software
    overhead, uncompressed  IFF-ILBM  files  can  be  loaded  considerably
    faster than other formats, especially on slower machines.

    When  we  write animations, at Cloanto we usually store them in ANIM-5
    format. This is the most supported standard for Amiga animation files.
    It also offers good compression. ANIM-7 files can be processed faster,
    although they are not  compressed  as  well  and  are  not  as  widely
    supported  as  ANIM-5.  We  use  ANIM-7  for 256-color animations, and
    sometimes to store all types of animations on  CD-ROM,  when  we  know
    that an ANIM-7 viewer is available (e.g. Personal Paint). Very rarely,
    when a disk is really packed, we  store  animations  in  the  ANIM-5+7
    format.  When  this  format is used, Personal Paint decides whether to
    use ANIM-5 or ANIM-7 on a frame-by-frame  basis,  depending  on  which
    format   yields  the  best  compression.  This  adheres  to  the  ANIM
    specifications, but requires that the software loading  the  animation
    can  handle both ANIM-5 and ANIM-7. We never use ANIM-8. It is neither
    as popular nor (in general) as good as ANIM-7.

    Quite often,  at  Cloanto  we  use  Personal  Paint  to  optimize  old
    animations (use of the Optimize Frames command is explained in section
    <6.3) before saving them again. This  alone  can  halve  the  size  of
    certain  animation  files.  Some  older and not very popular animation
    viewers do not  support  frame-by-frame  timing.  In  this  case,  the
    Optimize  Frames  command  cannot be used. These same programs usually
    also do not support more than one color palette per animation (see the
    introduction  to  chapter 6). Personal Paint marks these palettes with
    three dots under the  associated  frame  in  the  storyboard  (section
    <6.4).  At Cloanto, we use frame-by-frame timing and multiple palettes
    without concerns, since neither of the limitations described  here  is
    an  issue  with  the  most  recent  and  the most used Amiga animation
    viewers.

    A few other options  can  affect  the  animation  format.  Before  the
    animation  is  saved, we make sure that the current screen mode is the
    one that we want to associate to the  animation  (see  explanation  in
    this same section).

    Some  older  programs  have  a bug which does not allow them to handle
    certain types of properly-written ANIM files. DPaint (up to release V)
    is  one  of these programs. When compatibility with these applications
    is important, we disable the Full ANIM  Optimization  option  (section
    <6.2).

    As  an  author  or publisher of an image or animation, you may want to
    fill-in  the  Author,  Copyright  and  Annotation  texts,  which   are
    supported  by  most  file formats (section 4.10.1). You could put your
    name as the Author, and something like "Copyright  ©  [Year  of  first
    publication]  [Your  name]  -  Freely  Distributable" in the Copyright
    text. The  Annotation  could  include  a  postal  or  E-mail  address.
    Personal  Paint allows for this information to be easily edited at any
    time. Empty fields are not saved, and do not occupy any space  in  the
    file.

    On  the  Amiga,  Workbench  icons  are  usually  associated  to files.
    Personal Paints can save images and animations using the default icons
    stored in the "PPaint:PPaint_Icons" drawer. These icons also determine
    the Default Tool, which is the program which will be loaded  when  the
    file  is  double-clicked  on.  If  you  like the icons which come with
    Personal Paint (they are freely distributable), you can leave them  as
    they  are,  or  perhaps  you  may want to change the default tool, for
    example by putting "VT" instead of "PPaint:PPView". This  can  be  set
    with  the  Workbench  Information  command.  PPView is a short program
    which uses Personal Paint as a viewer (it loads Personal Paint, if  it
    is  not  already loaded). Please be careful not to Snapshot (Workbench
    command) the icons inside "PPaint:PPaint_Icons" to a  fixed  position.
    When  dropping  a  new  default  icon  inside  the  drawer, select the
    Workbench UnSnapshot command.

    At Cloanto, we usually set  the  Icons  option  to  Original  (section
    8.9.5)  when  we  only  want to change the file format of a picture or
    animation. This guarantees that the existing icon image  will  not  be
    affected.


    2.9 Personal Paint for Internet Publishing

    As more and more organizations and individuals publish their  work  on
    the  World  Wide  Web, it is becoming more important to stand out with
    carefully thought out Web pages. Graphics play an  important  part  in
    this. Poorly implemented pages annoy users with images having wrong or
    missing transparency information, lack  of  progressive  display,  and
    long  transmission  times for 256-color images where 16 or less colors
    could achieve the same results.

    Personal Paint is an ideal tool  for  the  creation  of  palette-based
    images  to be included in HTML documents (the standard for Web pages).
    Two file formats are recommended for this purpose: GIF and  PNG.  Both
    formats  support progressive display and transparency, the appropriate
    use of which can make a difference between a  good  page  and  a  poor
    page. We recommend the use of both features.

    PNG  is  technically  better  than  GIF,  but  it  has been officially
    introduced to the list of WWW-supported formats only in  1996.  It  is
    likely  that PNG will slowly replace GIF, which is being suffocated by
    patent problems. At Cloanto we began using GIF for our WWW images, but
    we expect to replace it with PNG as more and more browsers support it.

    Progressive  (also  called "interlaced") display is a feature which is
    useful whenever it takes a long time (seconds, if not minutes) to load
    an image. Images stored without this option can be displayed only line
    by line, from the top to the bottom. It is very difficult to  have  an
    idea  of  the  contents  of  such  an  image  at  the beginning of the
    transmission. If instead the progressive display  option  was  enabled
    when the original image was saved, the entire image can be viewed in a
    coarse resolution at the beginning of the transmission, and during the
    transmission it becomes progressively more detailed.

    All  versions of GIF and PNG support progressive display, although PNG
    uses a more appealing method. Personal Paint has a Progressive Display
    setting  in  the  Options  window  of  the  Save  Image and Save Brush
    requesters. Images saved using this option occupy slightly more space,
    but  can  be  displayed progressively during the load. This feature is
    widely used on the  Internet,  and  it  is  compatible  with  all  WWW
    browsers.

    Newer  browsers  support  a  feature  called  "Low Resolution Preview"
    ("LOWSRC" attribute  in  the  "IMG"  HTML  element),  which  makes  it
    possible  to  specify  a very compact image, usually in low resolution
    and  with  very  few   colors,   which   is   displayed   before   the
    higher-resolution  image is loaded and displayed in the same place. If
    this feature is used,  it  is  important  to  consider  that  the  low
    resolution  image can use progressive display, but the high resolution
    image should not, because  it  would  immediately  cover  the  preview
    image.

    Transparency is a feature which allows part of the image to be defined
    as transparent. This is  useful,  for  example,  when  non-rectangular
    images have to be displayed over a pattern. But even if the background
    of a non-rectangular shape has the same color of the page  background,
    we  recommend setting that color as transparent, because some browsers
    may remap the image background to a slightly different color than  the
    page  background  color.  Some  WWW  browsers  do not support the HTML
    commands which set the page background color, so an  image  background
    which  was  intended  to  be  the same as the page, could appear to be
    different. Transparency can prevent this. Active use  of  transparency
    helps maintaining the quality of the page even when these browsers are
    used.

    To preserve the best possible page quality even with older browsers we
    recommend  to  use transparency and at the same time to also make sure
    that the transparent color is the same as the page  background  color.
    This helps with those few browsers that do not support transparency.

    Personal Paint saves transparency information only when saving brushes
    (Save Brush command, rather than Save Image). The transparent color is
    defined  when  the brush is defined. If the Transparency option in the
    Settings menu is set to None, then no transparency  is  associated  to
    the  brush.  If  instead it is set to Color, then the background color
    during the brush definition is used as  transparent.  Other  types  of
    transparency,  such as transparency shapes which are not associated to
    a single color, which can  be  defined  and  stored  in  the  IFF-ILBM
    format, are poorly supported on the Internet, and not at all supported
    by the GIF format. So the only way to mark a region as transparent  is
    to  reserve  a color for that part of the picture, and selecting it as
    the background color before the brush is defined.

    GIF exists in two variants: GIF87a and GIF89a. PNG and GIF89a  support
    transparency.  GIF87a  does  not.  The GIF format is designed in a way
    that programs supporting only the "87a" format should be able to  read
    "89a"  images, skipping the transparency information. Personal Paint's
    most recent GIF input/output libraries ("personal_gif_io.library" from
    version  3.2) allow for the GIF version to be specified in the Options
    window of the Save Brush requester. Versions  from  5.1  also  support
    reading  and  writing  of  GIF  animations  (with  appropriate  client
    programs, such as Personal Paint 7).

    It is important to keep  in  mind  some  practical  Internet  traffic,
    bandwidth  and  cost  restraints,  which  suggest that the size of the
    image files should be as small as possible. If  you  are  planning  to
    publish a 256-color image, try to color-reduce it to 16, or even fewer
    colors. Very often, the difference in quality can hardly  be  noticed,
    but a 16-color image is transmitted twice as fast as one in 256 colors
    (and costs less, if traffic or time  are  charged).  Personal  Paint's
    most  professional  quantization  mode  is  activated  by  setting the
    Dithering option to Floyd-Steinberg,  with  the  Best  Quality  option
    active.  It  should  also  be  noted,  however,  that  Floyd-Steinberg
    dithering creates patterns which can slightly reduce  the  compression
    rate.

    In addition to supporting Internet still image formats, Personal Paint
    includes tools to create highly-optimized GIF animations, and to  edit
    "image  map  databases".  GIF  animations  became increasingly popular
    after 1995, when several browsers began supporting this format.  Image
    maps make it possible to specify regions on an image, and to associate
    them to actions that are executed when the user clicks  on  a  region.
    The  "LoadAnimGif",  "SaveAnimGif"  and  "WebMap"  Rexx macros contain
    additional  documentation  which  can  be   displayed   by   selecting
    "About..." in the Macro Selection requester (section 3.1.5).


    3.1.2 The Painting Tools

    While a mouse button is held down (e.g. to  define  a  brush),  cursor
    keys can be used to scroll the image, and Magnify Mode can be switched
    on and off using the keyboard shortcut (default = <m>).  In  animation
    mode,  it  is possible to switch to the previous or next frame while a
    painting tool is in use.


    3.1.3.2 The Font Requester

    A  second  scrollable list contains the different sizes and attributes
    available for the currently highlighted font. The sample text  can  be
    dragged and scrolled with the left or middle mouse button.

    Like in the file requester, the mouse can be dragged over the list box
    (which is automatically scrolled) to  highlight  one  item  after  the
    other.

    A cycle gadget allows the user to quickly switch among three different
    font paths: "FONTS:", "PPaint:fonts" and a user-defined custom path.


    3.1.4.3 Transparency Effects

    Personal  Paint  has two image processing effects which can be used to
    achieve different levels of transparency when copying one object  over
    the  other:  Environment  Transparency  and  Brush Transparency. Brush
    Transparency includes a special alpha channel mode.

    In all cases, the current image is always the one which is modified by
    the  effect  (i.e.  it  is the target image). Environment Transparency
    uses the other environment as the  source,  while  Brush  Transparency
    uses  the  current  brush  (and  the following brush, in alpha channel
    mode). Brush Transparency feels  more  intuitive  after  toggling  the
    Image  Processing  tool  on  the  toolbar to the third position (brush
    mode, section 3.1.4). Using the mouse, the brush can then be  "pasted"
    over  the  image, with a variable degree of transparency. If the brush
    image processing mode is combined with the  Environment  Transparency,
    it  is possible to create a "Rub Through" effect, as if a brush-shaped
    hole perforated the current image, making it possible to look into the
    other environment. This is one of the predefined effects, and is great
    for progressively bringing up details in animations.

    Since transparency effects tend to create a lot of new colors,  it  is
    recommended to activate the "F-S Error Diffusion" option in the Filter
    Selection requester. Like all other effects,  the  predefined  filters
    can  be  modified,  and  new  filters  can  be defined. The Kernel and
    DivFactor parameters of the filter are ignored, while Bias is used  to
    adjust  the  degree  of  transparency  of the source image (-1 = alpha
    channel mode, 0 = complete transparency, 255 = no  transparency).  The
    Rub  Through  effect  has  Bias  set  to 255 (i.e. the source image is
    copied over the destination image "as is"). The Bias DX and DY  values
    specify  the  horizontal  and  vertical  transparency  transition,  as
    described for other filters (e.g. Light-Dark Oblique Gradient).


    3.1.4.4 Alpha Channel

    The  alpha  channel is a special feature which is available with Brush
    Transparency effects. The alpha channel mode is activated  by  setting
    the Bias value to -1, and requires two consecutive brushes rather than
    one. In this mode, the degree of transparency of  each  pixel  in  the
    brush  is  a function of the brightness of the corresponding pixels in
    the second brush, rather than being defined by the plain  Bias  value.
    The  additional  transparency information provided by the second brush
    is called  alpha channel . This data is very useful, for example, to
    create  and manipulate images which must remain antialiased regardless
    of the background. White pixels in  the  second  brush  correspond  to
    complete  opacity,  while  black  and  undefined  pixels indicate full
    transparency.

    Example. Suppose you want to paste down a brush which is solid in  the
    center  and  gradually becomes more transparent towards the edges. The
    alpha channel brush would reflect this and  can  be  created  using  a
    gradient fill, white in the center fading to black around the edges.

    Single-brush  alpha  channel is also possible. This mode is associated
    to a Bias value of -2, which indicates  "Same  Brush"  alpha  channel.
    This  mode  applies the transparency information provided by the brush
    on the brush itself. For this reason, this option works best with  the
    Color Paint Mode (rather than Matte or Replace).


    3.1.4.5 Stereograms

    What is a single image stereogram? It is a single  picture  containing
    different  information  for the left and right eye. When the eyes look
    at the picture "normally", the  hidden  clues  cannot  be  recognized.
    However, when each eye looks at a different spot on the picture (which
    is what happens when the eyes pretend to look at an object  positioned
    before or beyond the picture), after some adjusting, matching patterns
    can be recognized. Acting  on  eye  convergence  and  divergence,  the
    differences in the pattern provide the brain with depth information.


    3.1.4.5.1 How to Create a Stereogram

    To generate a stereogram, you need to use both  program  environments:
    one  to  provide  depth  information  and  one  to  render  the actual
    stereogram. Stereogram animations are also possible. If you select the
    Pattern stereogram type (SIPS) instead of the Random Dot type (SIRDS),
    you need to store a tile-pattern in the current brush.

    In  single  image  stereograms,  the  "hidden  image"  is  defined  by
    different  levels of depth. The 3D image does not have its own colors:
    it consists of depth information only. It  does  however  inherit  the
    texture  of the "container" image, where very creative combinations of
    colors and patterns can be used. In the pattern type  of  stereograms,
    for  example, a pattern can be used to create a forest or a sea, where
    the 3D shapes can be concealed.

    Depth information is provided by shapes drawn in different  levels  of
    gray.  Simple  shapes are normally easier and quicker to recognize. If
    text needs to be written in the hidden image, sans-serif,  extra  bold
    type  is  usually  more  readable. Black indicates the "most elevated"
    (closest) level, white corresponds to the "deepest" (farthest)  level,
    while  "flatness"  is  associated  to  a  50%  gray  (in  the  Palette
    requester: H=0, S=0, V=50%). This is the level which is not  distorted
    when  using  pattern  stereograms.  Note  that  "front" and "back" are
    subjective, and can be reversed depending on the  technique  used  for
    viewing the image: cross-eyed or parallel style.

    Extreme  depths,  such as those associated to black and white, are not
    necessarily the easiest to recognize. To the contrary. Highest quality
    is usually provided by intensities closer to medium levels of gray.

    For  a  quick test, draw a black box on a 50% gray background. Then go
    to the other environment, choose an appropriate  screen  mode  (having
    the  same  size  as  the  screen  containing  the black box) and color
    palette, select Image Processing from the Project menu and select  one
    of the Stereogram filters. SIRDS (Random Dot Single Image Stereograms)
    are constructed using random dots, whereas SIPS (Single Image  Pattern
    Stereograms) use the current brush to create a pattern. Personal Paint
    will render the  stereogram  in  the  current  environment.  Different
    variants  of  predefined  filters  are  provided: High Quality filters
    produce stereograms which are easier to recognize,  whereas  the  More
    Levels filters are capable of rendering more detailed depth variations
    (up to 256 levels, associated to gray shades  ranging  from  white  to
    black).

    The  pattern  used  for  SIPS  stereograms  should  be as "fractal" as
    possible. Smooth color transitions and wide areas of  the  same  color
    should  be avoided. The more color-information per unit of length, the
    stronger the  illusion  will  be.  Since  the  patterns  are  slightly
    distorted  to  render  the  stereogram,  patterns  which are naturally
    irregular (such as leaves, waves, grass, marble, etc.) tend to be more
    suitable  than  other  (more  geometrical)  shapes.  Of  course  it is
    possible to retouch the resulting stereogram, or paste it into another
    picture,  to  create  something  like  a  beach  with  a  shark hidden
    underwater.

    Help symbols can be placed automatically on stereograms.  By  default,
    these  are  constructed  by drawing small squares on top of the image,
    but they can easily be replaced by pasting a  custom  brush  over  the
    square.  For convenience and maximum accuracy, the squares have an odd
    pixel size, so that in Magnify mode the brush handle  can  quickly  be
    positioned over the central pixel of the box.

    Technically,  stereograms are created by constructing vertical columns
    of almost identical patterns. When the eyes are crossed or widened  as
    required  to  view  single  image  stereograms,  each eye focuses on a
    different column. The difference between the repeated patterns is very
    similar  to  the  difference  perceived by the eyes when looking at an
    object  in  the  real  world.  What  makes  stereograms   particularly
    interesting  from  a  scientific  point  of  view  is that perspective
    information is not required at all. In fact, people who normally  rely
    on  perspective  rather than on eye convergence to calculate distances
    have more difficulties than others when viewing stereograms.

    The wider the pattern (i.e., the columns), the greater  the  perceived
    distance.  Too  narrow or too wide patterns should however be avoided,
    since the resulting stereograms are not easy to view (the eyes must be
    able  to  cross  or  widen  enough,  so  that two consecutive patterns
    overlap).

    The width of the pattern is determined either by the brush width (SIPS
    stereograms)  or  by  other  filter settings (section C.1). In case of
    SIPS, the current environment should have the same  color  palette  as
    the  brush. For stereograms about as large as a VGA computer screen, 8
    columns should provide a good quality/contrast compromise. This  means
    that for SIPS stereograms the brush width would be 1/8th of the screen
    width, in pixels. Of course a brush can contain  a  pattern  which  is
    already repeated two or more times in the brush itself.

    The stereogram cannot render any information in the far left and right
    of the image. This is because there can be no overlapping of  patterns
    when  one  eye  approaches the left or right edge, since the other eye
    would look outside the image.

    The complexity, and most of  the  compromises  of  computer  generated
    stereogram  generation are caused by the fact that each column forms a
    pair with both the column to its left and the one to its  right.  When
    all  this  information  is  overlapped,  shadows  and echo effects may
    appear.  Personal  Paint's  filter  settings  (section  C.1)   provide
    different  options  to  finely tune the creation process. For example,
    where "ghost" outlines result from very  sharp  changes  in  elevation
    (more  likely  to  occur in SIPS than in SIRDS), flattening the image,
    increasing the Quality value or activating the Echo Suppression option
    should  help.  Echo  Suppression  works by using random stripes of the
    pattern as necessary. As a side effect, the hidden shapes  may  emerge
    in the final image.

    For  very  small  stereograms  (e.g. thumbnail format), a High Quality
    SIRDS style with high contrast image colors  (e.g.  black  and  white)
    could be the best choice, if ease of recognition is a priority.

    For  stereo-animations,  SIRDS  are usually preferred to SIPS, because
    large patterns changing position from frame to frame would disturb the
    viewer.  Section C.1 explains how to change the random seed for SIRDS,
    or automatically use a new seed for each  stereogram.  One  may  think
    that  a  constant  animation background (as could be provided by using
    positive  BiasDx  values)   would   help   recognition   of   animated
    stereograms.  In  most  cases,  practice has proven the opposite to be
    true: if the random seed does not change from one frame to  the  other
    (and  thus  the  pattern  remains constant), the brain becomes able to
    concentrate on the "tricks" employed to render the stereogram.  So  it
    is  better  to  use  negative values (i.e. "noisy" background). In any
    case, creating an animation using a positive random seed value remains
    an interesting experiment.


    3.1.4.5.2 Viewing Stereograms

    Important: Single image stereograms have recently become very  popular
    through posters and best-selling books (e.g. "Magic Eye", "Stereogram"
    and "3D Wonderland" series). Personal Paint  uses  some  of  the  most
    recent  and  effective  stereogram generation techniques, although the
    first papers dealing with this subject have been published  more  than
    30  years  ago.  Since  stereograms  were  first  used  for scientific
    visualization and in medical tests, research  has  been  conducted  on
    potential side effects of humans viewing such images. Not only have no
    harmful effects been discovered, but the techniques used  for  viewing
    single image stereograms are also sometimes employed for eye training.
    While even reading a textbook may cause eye strain and mental fatigue,
    we  believe  that  it  remains prudent to consider that crossing eyes,
    merging two different views into  one  and  separating  focusing  from
    convergence are all actions which do not occur frequently in a natural
    environment. People with ametropia (e.g. hypermetropia or astigmatism)
    may   tire   more   easily  when  viewing  these  images.  Also,  some
    optometrists have advised that people with autonomic ataxia and  those
    at  the  beginning  of  farsightedness  caused  by  age  should  avoid
    attempting naked eyed 3D viewing.

    While other methods use polarized light or colored glasses to separate
    the  images,  single  image  stereograms  can be seen by focusing on a
    point which is either between the eyes  and  the  picture  (cross-eyed
    style),  or  much farther away than the picture (parallel style). Some
    stereograms can be seen in one of the two styles only.

    Most stereograms have two reference symbols on top of the picture,  to
    ease  proper  adjusting.  When you stare at the page out of focus, the
    two symbols may appear as four.  This  is  because  the  eyes  do  not
    converge  on  the same image, and thus see "double". Now slowly adjust
    your eyes until the two inner symbols overlap, so that you see a total
    of  three  symbols.  This  is  the  appropriate convergence to see the
    stereogram. Slowly move your eyes downwards. You should soon begin  to
    recognize  some  shapes, which your eyes will be able to focus on. The
    process can be initiated, for example, either  by  bringing  a  finger
    close  to  your  eyes and moving it, or by imagining to concentrate on
    something very distant (e.g. mountains or clouds), or by  putting  the
    picture  to  the  nose, and then slowly moving it forward, leaving the
    eyes unfocussed. It is very important that the page be perfectly  flat
    and  horizontal.  All  edges  should have about the same distance from
    your face. Try and resist the temptation to focus on the  monitor  (or
    paper).  Once  the brain begins to merge the two images, focusing will
    slowly follow automatically.

    Some people experience more difficulties than  others  when  seeing  a
    stereogram for the first time. Here is what William C. Haga had to say
    on the Internet: "Being one who has used  wide-eyed  vision  on  chain
    link fences ever since I was a kid, I was able to see the images right
    away. But I've had difficulty explaining  the  technique  to  friends.
    Today  I  had  the latest Games magazine with me at my parents' house.
    Games is running another contest using SIRDS, so there  are  three  in
    the  latest  issue.  This  time I thought of the reflection idea. So I
    opened mom's china cabinet, put the magazine against the glass in  the
    door,  and told mom to keep looking at her own reflection in the glass
    until the image appeared. It took less than thirty seconds.  When  she
    saw  the 3D train engines, I was subjected to a squeal of delight that
    I hadn't heard from her for a long time..."


    3.1.5 Macros

    The  Macros  tool (under the Text tool) can be selected with the right
    mouse button to select a new Rexx script, or with the left  button  to
    repeat  a  previously selected action. Personal Paint comes with a set
    of macros which can easily be explored with the About function in  the
    Macro Selection selection requester. Appendix F explains some advanced
    programming features in more detail.


    3.1.5.1 The Macro Selection Requester

    When  the  Macro tool is selected with the right mouse button (or with
    the left  button,  with  no  previously  selected  macro),  the  Macro
    Selection Requester appears.

    The central area of the requester displays the available macros, which
    are associated to Rexx programs  stored  in  Personal  Paint's  "Rexx"
    directory,  or  elsewhere,  if  so  specified in the program settings.
    Keyboard shortcuts are shown to the right of the macro names.

    Four gadgets appear in the upper part of  the  requester:  New,  Edit,
    Delete  and  About.  New  and Edit display the Edit Macro requester to
    respectively define a new macro definition or edit  an  existing  one.
    Delete   removes   a   macro  entry  from  the  list.  About  displays
    instructions and other information  on  the  selected  macro,  if  the
    associated  Rexx program contains such data (appearing anywhere in the
    program, delimited by "/**" and "*/", with  an  optional  three-letter
    language  code after "/** "). More information about the format of the
    information displayed by the About function appears in the description
    of the WORDWRAP option of Personal Paint's RequestNotify Rexx command.

    The  Execute,  Exit  and Cancel gadgets on the bottom of the requester
    respectively execute the selected macro, or exit the requester leaving
    any  changes to the macros as they are, or cancel all changes and exit
    the requester.


    3.1.5.2 The Edit Macro Requester

    Personal  Paint  macros are defined by two sets of information: a Rexx
    program and the data specified in the Edit Macro requester. The latter
    is  entirely  optional, but it is useful to associate an extended name
    and a shortcut to the Rexx file, and  also  to  access  Rexx  programs
    which may be stored in directories other than "PPaint/Rexx".

    The  Name  field  allows the user to define a name other than the file
    name. If no name is  defined,  the  file  name  (without  its  suffix)
    appears  in  the  list  of  the  Macro Selection requester. The use of
    different arguments (see below) makes  it  possible  to  have  several
    macros  appearing with different names, but referring to the same Rexx
    program.

    The Shortcut field is used to associate a  keyboard  shortcut  to  the
    macro. The same format of menu and other shortcuts applies (as used in
    "UIText.xxx" files).

    The File field specifies the full path and file name of the macro.  By
    default,  Personal  Paint  macros  are  stored  in  the  "PPaint/Rexx"
    directory. This field makes it possible to include  macros  associated
    to  Rexx  programs  stored elsewhere, for example in "ColorType:Rexx".
    The Set gadget displays a file requester, which can be used to  define
    the File information.

    The Arguments field allows the user to define an optional string which
    the software passes to the Rexx program upon  execution.  This  string
    may contain some special codes, introduced by the "%" sign:

    %p = Name of the Rexx port

    %n = Macro name (as defined in the Name field)

    %b = Mouse button pressed (typically in combination with %x and %y): 1
    = left, 3 = right. The middle mouse button  is  not  used,  as  it  is
    associated to the program's "image drag" mode.

    %x = X-coordinate

    %y = Y-coordinate

    %w = Width (relative to %x)

    %h = Height (relative to %y)

    When  a  macro is executed, Personal Paint detects the presence of any
    %p, %x, %y, %w and %h codes and waits for the user to mark a point  or
    a  rectangular  region  (only  if  %w  or %h are found in the argument
    string). If the macro is operating in rectangular mode (if  %w  or  %h
    are  used  in the argument), then the macro is executed as soon as the
    mouse button used to define the rectangle is released. Otherwise,  the
    macro  is  executed  immediately. If only %p, %x, or %y are used (that
    is, no %w or %h), then the macro is executed  as  soon  as  the  mouse
    button  is  pressed  (without  waiting for the button to be released).
    This allows the macro to do some work based on the  position  and  the
    timing  of  further  user actions. In such a case, the LockGUI command
    should never be used in the Rexx program before the required input  is
    received.

    When the Rexx program receives the argument string, all "%" codes have
    already  been  replaced  by  Personal  Paint   with   the   associated
    information.  In the same way as arguments are normally passed to Rexx
    programs by the Amiga Shell, Personal Paint passes all arguments as  a
    single string (ARG(1)). It is then up to the Rexx program to parse the
    string (PARSE ARG <template>). The macros  which  come  with  Personal
    Paint include examples of argument parsing.

    In  the  program  settings files, the MACRO keyword is used to set the
    various parameters found in the Edit Macro requester, in the following
    format:

    MACRO = "Name", "Shortcut", "File", "Arguments"

    For example:

    MACRO = "Web Map", "Ctrl-m", "Rexx/WebMap.pprx", "%p"

    MACRO = "Help - Rexx", "Ctrl-h",
       "PPaint:Rexx/Help.pprx", "%p Command GUI \"%n\""

    MACRO = "Test", "", "PPaint:Rexx/Test.pprx", "%x %y %p"


    3.1.6 Define Brush

    In  animation  mode  (with 2 or more frames) the Define Brush tool can
    cycle  through  two  additional  modes:  Rectangular  Anim-Brush   and
    Freehand   Anim-Brush.   These  modes  allow  for  the  definition  of
    anim-brushes. After the region has been marked, a  requester  appears,
    allowing  the user to specify how many frames are to be processed, and
    the direction (forward or backward, from the current position).


    3.1.9 Clear

    When the Clear tool is selected with the right mouse button, the Clear
    Frames requester appears. This  allows  the  user  to  clear  (without
    removing) one or more Animation frames.


    3.1.10 Undo

    The Undo tool allows the user to move backwards and  forwards  through
    the history of changes applied to the image and to its color palette.

    Clicking  on  Undo  with the right mouse button performs a "redo". The
    maximum number of changes which can be undone (undo levels) is limited
    only by the available RAM and hard disk space, and can be finely tuned
    in the Memory Management requester (sections 1.3.5, 8.<3.2 and C.1).

    The use of Personal Paint's multi-level undo feature is not limited to
    experimenting  and  correcting mistakes. For example, it may sometimes
    be useful to go back a few levels only to copy a  piece  of  an  older
    image  with  the  Brush  tool, and then paste the brush on the current
    image. Copying an area with a brush does not affect the chain of  undo
    levels.

    The  undo  buffer  can  be  freed  either  by pressing <Ctrl-u>, or by
    clicking on the dedicated gadget in the Memory  Information  requester
    (section  4.11),  or  by  selecting  the  Clear tool twice. This is an
    extremely useful way of  making  some  memory  available  in  critical
    conditions.

    The Brush and Color Palette menus have Restore functions which provide
    for additional undo capabilities (sections 5.5 and 7.1.6).


    3.2 Moving Around

    The  image  can be scrolled to the end of the page by holding down the
    <Alt> key while the cursor keys are used.


    3.4 The File Requester

    The  mouse  can  be  dragged over the list box (which is automatically
    scrolled)  to  highlight  different  items.  Only  the  last  item  is
    selected.

    One  unified list, associated to a single gadget (or to a click on the
    right mouse button), includes both logical  and  physical  device  and
    assigned  names.  The list ends with a pre-selection of the full paths
    whose contents is already loaded by other file requesters in the  same
    program. For example, if a brush needs to be loaded from the same path
    already used to load an image, from the "Load Brush" file requester it
    will  be sufficient to click on the right mouse button and click again
    on the appropriate entry at the end of the list box.

    The Delete gadget can be used to delete files and (empty) directories.
    A  new  directory can be created by extending the Path string (e.g. by
    editing "Pictures:" into "Pictures:Space"). "def_Drawer" is  installed
    in  "PPaint:PPaint_Icons" in order to allow the program to associate a
    Workbench icon to the drawers which are created.

    All file requester paths can be saved as default paths in the  program
    settings files. These configuration options are explained in detail in
    appendix C.


    4.1 Load Image

    Recognition  of  previously  supported file formats has been improved.
    State of the art color quantization and reduction algorithms have been
    employed  to  load 24-bit images and transform them into images having
    256 or less colors. The quality of the resulting 256-color  images  is
    not  easily  distinguishable  from  a  24-bit  display.  The  selected
    Dithering option (section 8.7) is taken into account by the new 24-bit
    procedures   (Floyd-Steinberg  gives  best  quality,  whereas  Pattern
    Dithering combines good quality with high speed).

    HAM and HAM8 are processed by the program as 24-bit  images  (just  as
    24/48-bit PNG, IFF24 and PCX24). Personal Paint also uses the DataType
    loaders supported from version 3.0 of the Amiga operating system.

    Personal Paint excels in handling HAM,  HAM8  and  24-bit  images  and
    transforming  them  into  color-indexed  pictures  (up to 256 colors).
    During this high quality conversion process, the program  can  display
    the  original  HAM  or  24-bit  image  in  a second screen (HAM, HAM8,
    Picasso, CyberGraphX, etc.). The two processes take advantage of Amiga
    multitasking:  one  program  continues working on the image, while the
    other allows the user to view the original image.

    When a 24-bit image  is  loaded,  the  program  presents  a  requester
    indicating the format of that image. The top gadget, which is selected
    by default, tells the program to use the screen size of the new image.
    If the "Preview" option of that requester is selected, a second screen
    will open (in  HAM  or  24-bit  mode).  While  the  second  screen  is
    displayed,  Personal  Paint continues color quantization and dithering
    in the background. The first screen always contains the usual progress
    requesters indicating the status of the conversion.

    The  preview screen and the main screen can be swapped by pressing the
    <Space> bar or by clicking the right mouse button. Pressing <Esc>,  or
    clicking  on  the  left  mouse  button  while  the  preview  screen is
    displayed closes the preview screen.

    The more professional settings (sections 8.6 and 8.7)  may  be  slower
    when  viewing and/or color-reducing HAM, HAM8 and 24-bit images, while
    Pattern Dithering limited to 16 colors is considerably faster.

    In animation mode, if the image format differs from the  frame  format
    of  the  current  animation,  a requester appears to allow the user to
    decide whether to resize  the  image  or  the  animation.  Load  Image
    normally  loads  the  picture  into  the  current  animation frame. If
    animation is no longer desired, Free Animation must be selected before
    loading the picture.


    4.3 Print Image

    In addition to the system printer and PostScript modes, Personal Paint
    incorporates  24-bit printing routines, as well as an interface to the
    Studio Print Server software. This allows  users  of  the  Studio  and
    CanonStudio  packages  (version  2  and beyond) to print directly from
    Personal Paint.

    If the Mode cycle gadget is set to Studio, Personal  Paint  adds  each
    print job to the Studio print spool, and does not need to wait for the
    printing process to complete. The image data is stored in a  temporary
    file,  from  where it is printed by Studio. Personal Paint's temporary
    files are stored in the device having more free space,  choosing  from
    those specified in the Virtual Memory settings (section 8.<3.1).

    Personal Paint's Studio server (message port) name is "PPaint_Studio".
    This name may be requested by the Studio  software  (e.g.  to  save  a
    configuration).


    4.3.2.1 Dithering

    Custom dithering routines have been written using the latest  software
    technologies in order to yield maximum quality in 24-bit printing.

    Ordered  dithering  is  the default, and gives good print quality at a
    reasonable speed (dispersed 16x16 matrix - more technical  information
    in  section 3.1.4.2). Halftone dithering (clustered 7x7 matrix) may be
    suitable   for   pictures   containing   mostly   saturated    colors.
    Floyd-Steinberg gives best results, but takes longer to compute.


    4.3.2.4 Shade

    Personal Paint now features 24-bit printing (16 million colors), which
    overcomes the traditional limitation of 4096 colors and 16 gray shades
    of the Amiga printer device. (Personal  Paint's  PostScript  mode  has
    always been 24-bit.) The new modes are activated by the "24-bit Color"
    and "8-bit Gray" settings in the Shade cycle gadget.

    24-bit printing uses special dithering routines to create color shades
    from  a  limited  set  of  primary  printer  colors  (more  in section
    4.3.2.1). A few printers work in "true color", and do not require  the
    program  to  create dithering patterns. For example, the Fargo Primera
    dye-sublimation color printer comes with its  own  24-bit  driver.  In
    such a case, normal system printing can be used.

    Even in 24-bit printing, it is still necessary to have the appropriate
    Amiga printer driver selected through the  Amiga  Preferences  (unless
    Personal Paint is operating in its own PostScript mode).

    Further  adjustments to improve print quality can be made in the Gamma
    Correction and Undercolor Removal  requester  which  is  displayed  by
    clicking on Correct/Set (section 4.3.2.8).

    Personal Paint's color correction and dithering routines were designed
    to go directly to the printer. Some "24-bit"  printing  utilities  are
    available  for  the  Amiga  in  replacement of normal printer drivers.
    These utilities do not receive 24-bit data from applications (at least
    not  until version 3.2 of the Amiga operating system). They should not
    be used in combination with Personal Paint's  24-bit  printing  modes,
    unless  all of their color correction options are disabled. Otherwise,
    different dithering patterns and color correction  procedures  overlap
    and interfere with each other, with very poor results.

    Some  Amigas  are  slowed down by system DMA operations when images in
    256 colors are displayed. Bringing a 4-color Workbench screen  to  the
    front  can  speed  up other programs, including printing with Personal
    Paint.

    For optimum results in 24-bit printing,  it  is  advised  to  set  the
    highest  Density supported by the printer driver (section 4.3.2.6). In
    particular, using the HP DeskJet printers with  the  drivers  included
    with  Personal  Paint,  Dithering  should  be  set to Floyd-Steinberg,
    Threshold should be set to 1 (this turns off depletion by the  driver)
    and  Density  to  7  (maximum  shingling). While these settings reduce
    printing speed, they maximize print quality. With these  settings,  it
    is  normally  not  necessary  to  make further adjustments to Personal
    Paint's Color Correction tables. Special ink-jet paper, or paper  used
    for color copiers give best results.


    4.3.2.8 Color Correction

    In 24-bit printing mode, the Set gadget can be selected  to  tune  the
    Gamma  Correction  and  Undercolor  Removal settings. Section 4.3.3.11
    (Color Separation) has more on printing inks, while section 4.3.3.11.1
    (Color Correction and Undercolor Removal) explains undercolor removal,
    which in 24-bit printing is similar to the same  feature  of  Personal
    Paint's PostScript mode.

    Personal  Paint  can  correct  each ink component (e.g. cyan, magenta,
    yellow or black) separately. The Component  cycle  gadget  allows  the
    user to switch between the individual correction tables.

    Clicking   on  the  graph  reverses  the  notation.  By  default,  low
    ink-density values are placed at the lower left of the graph. This  is
    the traditional orientation used in the printing industry.

    The  Brightness  and  Contract knobs act as described in section 7.1.4
    (Adjust Palette).

    Ink smear and overlapping dots  ("dot  gain")  cause  the  printer  to
    respond  in a non-linear way to the color information it receives from
    the computer. The Gamma Correction function is used to compensate  for
    this.  Gamma  values  smaller  than  1  make the image lighter. Values
    greater than 1 cause it to be printed  darker.  An  appropriate  gamma
    curve  can  drastically  improve image quality, while at the same time
    limiting the loss of information to a minimum, if any.

    The program default values can be adjusted in order to obtain a closer
    match  between  the picture which is displayed, and the printed image.
    To further tune the values to suit  a  particular  image,  it  may  be
    useful to print small, "critical" regions of the image using the Print
    Brush function.


    4.4 Grab Screen

    In  animation  mode,  multiple  screens  can be grabbed automatically.
    After a screen is grabbed (either with the <Ctrl>+<Alt>  keys,  or  by
    pressing  Proceed),  Personal  Paint  adds  a  new animation frame and
    remains in grab mode. This  allows  the  user  to  record  a  tutorial
    animation,  or to grab multiple requesters or menus for inclusion in a
    manual, without having to switch back and forth between applications.


    4.5 Image and Screen Format

    The Lock Display Mode gadget, to the right of the field indicating the
    selected screen mode, prevents the Load Image function  from  changing
    either the display mode or the setting of the Autoscroll option.

    By activating this option, together with Autoscroll, it is possible to
    quickly view a series of images having  the  most  different  formats,
    while at the same time preventing flickering on multiscan monitors.

    An   optimized   color  average  resize  algorithm,  which  calculates
    additional, new antialiasing colors to enhance the image,  is  applied
    whenever all of the following conditions are met:

    - Color Average Resize option is enabled
    - Image size is reduced
    - Number of colors is increased


    4.8.<3 Copy Animation

    This command copies the entire animation to the other environment.


    4.10 Information

    4.10.1 Project Information

    This requester provides information on the current image or animation,
    and allows the user to  edit  some  annotations  which  can  be  saved
    together with the file.

    The  contents  of  the  Author,  Copyright  and  Annotation  fields is
    normally stored inside the file when using the IFF (ILBM, ANIM, etc.),
    PNG  or  GIF formats, and as an Amiga filenote (file comment - maximum
    80  characters)  if  other  formats  are  used.  No  additional   file
    information  is  stored  if  all  fields  are  empty. In this case, an
    existing Amiga filenote is cleared, and no extension chunks (IFF,  PNG
    or GIF) are stored.

    The  Annotation field may be useful to provide indications such as the
    author's address, trademark  information  related  to  the  image,  or
    particular techniques employed to create or process the image.


    4.11 Memory Information

    Memory occupied by  each  animation  is  included  in  the  respective
    Environment  field.  Animations  also  require  some  RAM  for  screen
    buffers, which is accounted for in the Buffers field.

    Three gadgets can be used to flush  or  free  RAM  in  memory-critical
    situations.

    When  Flush  is  selected,  Personal  Paint  moves as much RAM data as
    possible (Chip, Fast and virtual storage) to  disk  storage.  This  is
    useful to launch other software in an unexpected low-RAM condition.

    Flush  All  goes  beyond  this,  and its use should be limited to more
    critical situations: it frees any remaining buffers (such as  the  one
    used  to  display  the  brush  with  an image, rather than with a thin
    border) and may attempt to close the Workbench.

    Free Undo frees all information stored in the Undo/Redo  buffer.  This
    is equivalent to pressing <Ctrl-u> in normal paint mode.


    5.<4 Grab Window

    This command is very similar to Grab Screen (section 4.4),  only  that
    it  allows the user to grab a single window, storing it in the current
    brush. Windows are listed grouped  by  screen.  A  number  before  the
    window name indicates the screen group to which the window belongs.

    The Activate Window option makes sure that the window to be grabbed is
    both active (inactive windows may have different colors, especially on
    the  title  bar)  and  completely  visible (otherwise covered parts of
    "simple refresh" windows cannot be grabbed, as they first have  to  be
    rebuilt by the program which opened them).


    6. The Animation Menu

    An animation, as the name implies, is very much like a cinema film, or
    a   cartoon  made  by  photographing  a  series  of  drawings  (called
    "frames").  Personal  Paint  offers  a  unique  and  powerful  set  of
    animation  features.  It  allows  users to easily manipulate frames or
    groups of frames through its visual Storyboard. The  program  exploits
    the  ANIM  standard better than other programs. This leads to improved
    file compression and gives more space to creativity. For  example,  it
    is  possible  to  use  more  than  one palette for different groups of
    frames, or program the exact time for which an individual frame is  to
    be  displayed  during  playback. It is also possible to resize, cut or
    stretch an entire animation  as  if  it  was  a  simple  picture.  The
    animation  which is being edited doesn't even need to fit in Chip RAM,
    as Personal Paint can store frames in Fast RAM. The program  can  also
    quickly play animation files of any size directly from disk.

    Personal  Paint  accepts  and creates the following animation formats:
    ANIM-5, ANIM-7 (short and long-words), ANIM-8 (short  and  long-words)
    and  hybrid  files  which  may  contain any combination of these frame
    formats. In general,  ANIM-5  remains  the  most  space-efficient  and
    widely used format.

    Personal Paint includes the original Auto ANIM save format, which, for
    each animation frame, selects the best compression scheme (ANIM-5,  7,
    etc.)  Compared  to pure ANIM-5 files, hybrid files may be up to 5-10%
    shorter, and still remain fully  compatible  with  the  official  ANIM
    specifications.

    ANIM-8  is  an evolution of ANIM-5, just as ANIM-7 is, although ANIM-7
    is generally considered to  be  superior.  Compared  to  ANIM-5,  both
    formats  may  achieve  faster loading of animation files (and improved
    "Play File" performance).

    Animations created with Personal  Paint  can  be  displayed  by  other
    commercial  products,  as  well  as  by  famous,  freely distributable
    animation players, like  Viewtek (which plays ANIM-7  starting  from
    version  1.04)  and   RTAP (Real Time Anim Player) - both supporting
    multiple palettes and frame-by-frame timing.

    Hundreds and hundreds  of  existing  animation  files  could  be  made
    shorter  by  simply loading and saving them again with Personal Paint.
    This is because the program does some  additional  work  (compared  to
    other  software)  when  it  chooses how to compress bitplanes of frame
    data. The resulting files can still be read even by most of  the  very
    first ANIM-5 players.

    Optimization  can go even further. Many programs insert "dummy" timing
    frames just to have an image appear for longer time on the screen. All
    groups  of identical frames can be stripped into a single frame with a
    new timing value. Personal Paint has a function to do exactly this.

    For example, the original file containing the well-known "Amy Walks 2"
    animation,  by Eric W. Schwartz, is 341 276 bytes long. Saved again by
    Personal Paint, in the same ANIM-5 format (without frame stripping) it
    is 45 Kbytes shorter.

    And  the famous "Doggie's Inferno" cartoon originally occupies 153 576
    bytes. This is for 317 frames. But, apart from  the  less  than  ideal
    compression,  248  of  these frames are identical to other frames, and
    only serve as time-fillers. With Personal Paint, this is not necessary
    any  more.  By  stripping these frames and saving the animation again,
    the file ends up being only 84 782 bytes:  almost  half  the  original
    length.

    If  an  animation has smooth "fade-in" or "fade-out" effects, there is
    no need to have huge global color palettes: each  frame  or  group  of
    frames  may have its own individual palette. The Storyboard includes a
    function to apply smooth palette variations to consecutive frames.

    Personal Paint can load, manipulate  and  play  animations  using  any
    palette-based   screen  mode.  This  includes  support  of  all  Amiga
    chip-sets and RTG graphic boards. When  using  non-Amiga  video  modes
    (e.g.  a  third-party  display  card), it is important to keep in mind
    that  the  selected  screen  mode  must  support  a   feature   called
    double-buffering.  The  software driver used with the RTG board should
    support  double-buffering  through  Intuition  library   calls   (this
    normally  requires  version 3.0 of the Amiga operating system). On all
    Amigas, double-buffering is  a  standard  feature,  supported  by  all
    versions  of  the operating system. Also, the frame size cannot exceed
    the maximum screen size (underscan, overscan and autoscroll  are  OK).
    If these conditions are not met, an animation can still be edited, but
    smooth playing cannot be guaranteed. The Play File  function  supports
    additional display modes (e.g. HAM and HAM8).

    While  Personal Paint is in general compatible with screen "promoters"
    (utilities that intercept a request to open a given screen,  and  open
    another  type of screen instead), it is not completely safe to promote
    from double-buffering to non-double-buffering modes, or from Amiga  to
    RTG  modes,  or  vice  versa.  In  case  of  difficulties,  the screen
    promoting software should be disabled.

    Which file format is best? The ANIM-5 file format is the most accepted
    and  widespread  of  all  Amiga  animation formats. It also achieves a
    better compression rate. The ANIM-7 format compensates in part for the
    additional  overhead of playing animations which have large amounts of
    data per frame (e.g. animations which take advantage of the additional
    numbers of colors of AGA screen modes) directly from file. Once loaded
    into the program, animations end up being the same regardless  of  the
    file  format.  However, if a 256-color animation has to be played from
    file, it can be much faster if it is stored in  ANIM-7  format.  While
    ANIM-7  is  faster  than  ANIM-5  if  played  from  file, it is not as
    space-efficient, nor as standard. Some animation programs cannot  even
    load  it. Two variants of ANIM-7 exist: ANIM-7S (short-word based) and
    ANIM-7L (long-word based). The latter format may be played even faster
    than  ANIM-7S on some computers, but files are longer. ANIM-8 also has
    a Short and a Long variant.


    6.1 Load Animation

    This function loads an animation from file. If the current environment
    already contains an animation in the same frame size as the one  being
    loaded, a requester appears to select how new frames are to be loaded.

    The following options are available:

    Load New: clears the current animation and loads the new one;

    Append: adds the new frames to the end of the current animation;

    Insert  Before:  inserts  the  new  frames  before the frame specified
    through the proportional gadget displayed in the same requester;

    Insert After: just like Insert Before, but frames are  inserted  after
    the specified frame.

    Overwrite: the new frames overwrite existing frames, starting from the
    specified frame; frames exceeding the length of the current  animation
    are appended at the end.

    The  frames  are  displayed  as  they are loaded. The <Esc> key can be
    pressed to stop loading frames (frames already loaded remain intact).


    6.2 Save Animation

    After  the usual file requester, a custom requester allows the user to
    select the file format  (among  the  formats  already  described)  and
    whether to save the entire animation, or only part of it.

    A  standard  Amiga  animation  should  be  saved  from  a  screen mode
    supporting double-buffering, which is required for smooth  playing  of
    the animation. While Personal Paint will try to animate as smoothly as
    possible in any screen  mode,  some  animation  players  do  not  even
    attempt  to play an animation in non-double-buffered screen modes. The
    correct screen mode information is stored by Personal  Paint  together
    with the animation (as required by the ANIM standard).

    The  "Full  ANIM Optimization" flag is normally activated, and in most
    cases it  shouldn't  be  necessary  to  change  this  setting.  A  few
    "primitive"  pieces  of  animation software may not completely support
    certain compression modes, which have always been  part  of  the  ANIM
    standard.  If this option is disabled, Personal Paint will not perform
    certain optimizations which are normally very important to  achieve  a
    good  compression,  but  which  cannot  be  processed  properly by the
    incomplete software. This feature has only  been  added  to  guarantee
    full  compatibility  with all animation players (even the oldest), and
    should be of interest only to the more  technical-oriented  users.  In
    practice,  it  is  easier  to  come  across  a rare piece of animation
    software which does not support multiple palettes  and  frame-by-frame
    timing  (which are not related to this option), than finding one which
    cannot  handle  compression  properly  (e.g.  single  descriptors  for
    multiple plane-differences).


    6.3 Play File

    Personal Paint can play even  the  largest  animations  directly  from
    file,  even on computers with a standard memory configuration. This is
    also useful to view an animation before loading it. Play File does not
    affect  the  contents  of  the  current environment (image, animation,
    etc.)

    Some animations may impose too much overhead on a particular system to
    be  played  in  real  time  (that  is,  smoothly).  If the hardware or
    software cannot keep up with a particularly data-intensive  animation,
    it  may  be  wiser to store the animation in one of the ANIM-7 formats
    rather  than  using  ANIM-5,  as  explained  in  the  introduction  to
    animation.

    If  there is sufficient RAM, Play File temporarily uses virtual memory
    (if it is switched on) to store the animation in the RAM storage area.
    This   allows   the  animation  to  be  played  faster,  and  prevents
    unnecessary wear-out of the peripheral  storage  device  whenever  the
    computer is used for repeating an animation over and over again.

    The  short initial delay usually associated to loading an animation to
    RAM can be avoided by switching off the RAM Storage  (section  8.<3.1)
    virtual  memory  setting.  This  may be especially useful when playing
    more than one animation from an ARexx script.

    Play File will continue playing the animation, until <Esc> is  pressed
    or a mouse button is clicked.


    6.4 The Storyboard

    The Storyboard is  a  powerful  visual  animation  editing  tool.  The
    Storyboard  requester  displays all frames in a thumbnail format, from
    left to right, top to bottom, as they appear in the animation.

    If all the frames don't completely fit in the  requester,  the  scroll
    bar  can be used to move around. Both the requester and the frames can
    be resized. The requester has a  resize  gadget  on  the  bottom-right
    corner,  while  the  size  of  the  reduced  frames can be selected by
    pressing the right mouse button, and dragging the  mouse  to  indicate
    the  desired  size.  This  information  can  be  saved  in the program
    settings files.

    The number under each frame indicates the sequential position of  that
    frame  within  the  animation.  During all actions, a parallel process
    creates, displays, maintains and updates the reduced thumbnail-images.
    If the frames are very similar to each other, it may be appropriate to
    select a larger frame size.

    Three dots under a frame indicate frames having  a  palette  differing
    from the current one. Double-clicking on a frame makes that frame (and
    its palette) the current one. In case of  animations  having  multiple
    palettes,  having  a  current  frame  with  the  same  palette  as the
    thumbnails improves the quality and speed at which the thumbnails  are
    displayed.

    One or more frames can be "selected" by pressing the left mouse button
    and dragging the mouse over a number of frames.  Selected  frames  are
    highlighted  by a light border, and indicate the source or target of a
    storyboard operation. The current selection can be extended by holding
    down  a  <Shift>  key  and  clicking  on  a frame. A cursor positioned
    between two frames indicates  where  frames  would  be  inserted.  The
    cursor  is  positioned with the mouse. A double-click on a frame makes
    that frame the  current  frame  in  the  animation  (that  is,  it  is
    displayed in full-size in the background).

    The  top  of  the requester contains a series of gadgets. Many gadgets
    have an equivalent in the Palette requester  (section  7.1.3).  Others
    are special to the Storyboard.

    The first two gadgets are used to add or insert new frames. The number
    in the string gadget indicates how many frames have  to  be  inserted.
    The insertion point is marked by the cursor. Insertion occurs whenever
    the Add gadget is selected.

    The following gadget is used to delete the selected range of frames.

    To the right of the Delete gadget is the Insert gadget. It acts on the
    currently  selected frames, and waits until the cursor is repositioned
    to insert a copy of these frames at the new insertion  point  (outside
    the source range). The source frames remain intact. To move a group of
    frames from one point to another, the Insert and Delete operations can
    be used in sequence.

    The  following  gadget is the Copy gadget, which "copies over" a range
    of frames. It takes the source range and waits for a target  range  to
    be  marked  with  the  mouse.  Then  it  copies  the  source  over the
    destination. If the source contains less frames than the  destination,
    then  the  source  frames  are repeated, one after the other. Both the
    source and the destination can, of course, be a single frame.

    Copy Palette works exactly  like  Copy,  but  only  copies  the  color
    palettes of the selected frames.

    Like  in  the  Palette  requester,  there are two color spread gadgets
    (Create RGB and HSB Range, section 7.1.3.6), which apply  intermediate
    palettes to the frames between the first and last frames in the range.

    The  Restore  gadget  restores  the  animation  as  it  was  when  the
    Storyboard was displayed. This function (like the Cancel gadget in the
    Storyboard) requires virtual memory to be active (section 8.<3.1).

    Clicking  on  the Hide gadget temporarily hides the requester (as long
    as the mouse button is held down), in order to give a full view of the
    current frame.

    The  Delay  string gadget indicates the timing value associated to the
    selected frame (or to the first of  a  range  of  frames).  This  time
    value, expressed in ticks (1 tick = 1/60th of a second), indicates for
    how long a frame has to remain  on  screen  before  the  next  one  is
    displayed.  A new value can be applied by typing a value in the string
    gadget and pressing <Return>. The new value is applied to  all  frames
    in the Storyboard range.


    6.5 Free Animation

    This command releases the current animation. The  current  environment
    switches  from  animation mode to single picture mode. This command is
    required before loading an image, unless the image  should  be  loaded
    into the current animation frame.


    6.6 Animation Frames

    6.6.1 Move to Frame

    These menu subitems respectively allow the user to quickly jump to the
    previous  or  next  frame,  or  to  a  frame  specified by number. The
    keyboard shortcuts to these commands can  be  selected  even  while  a
    painting tool is in use. For example, it is possible to keep using the
    same tool from one frame to the next (using the default  <2>  shortcut
    for Next Frame), without even releasing the mouse button.


    6.6.2 Add Frame

    The Add Frame command adds a copy of  the  current  frame  immediately
    after it. The new frame becomes the current frame. Nice effects can be
    obtained,  for  example,  by  alternating  "Add  Frame"   with   image
    processing,  resulting  in  progressive  blurring or randomization, or
    other distortions.

    If there is no animation, the first issue of Add Frame transforms  the
    current  image  into  a  single-frame animation. A normal image is not
    treated as a single-frame animation.


    6.6.3 Optimize Frames

    The  Optimize  Frames command searches for duplicate frames, generally
    created with other animation programs in order to have an image appear
    longer  on  the  screen  (the  introduction  to  animation  has a more
    detailed explanation of this). The frames are  merged  into  a  single
    frame,  having a time-value equal to the sum of the time values of the
    original frames. The resulting animation is visually identical to  the
    original,  except  that  when  it  is  stored  to  file  it can occupy
    considerably less space.


    6.7 Play Animation

    By  default, the current animation is played from beginning to end (in
    all modes: Continuous,  Once  and  Ping  Pong).  The  Range  selection
    requester  allows the user to select a range of frames to be played in
    the Play Once and Play Ping Pong modes.

    Play Continuous plays the animation from the first to the last  frame.
    After  the last frame, the animation is played again. This is repeated
    until a key or a mouse button are pressed. Play Once  only  plays  the
    animation  (or  a range, if specified) once, while Play Ping Pong goes
    back and forth from the first frame to the last, and  vice  versa.  In
    practice,  during  a "creative" session, the Range option is excellent
    for quickly checking the result of the most recent changes (using Play
    Once and Play Ping Pong), while Play Continuous can be used to see how
    everything fits together.

    During animation, the standard Amiga keyboard shortcuts can be used to
    depth-arrange  the  screen (<Left Amiga>+<N>/<M>) or to drag it up and
    down (<Left Amiga>+<Mouse Drag>, or whatever specified in the IControl
    Preferences).


    6.8 Animated Brushes

    Animated brushes (also called "anim-brushes") are brushes that contain
    more  than  one  frame. Each time an animated brush is pasted onto the
    image, it automatically advances to the following frame. The order  in
    which the frames appear can be adjusted (section <6.8.3). If the <Caps
    Lock> key is active when an anim-brush is pasted, all  frames  in  the
    selected  anim-brush  range  are  pasted  onto  consecutive  animation
    frames. The standard Amiga mouse-emulation keys can be used  for  most
    accurate positioning: <Amiga> + <Cursor> for positioning and <Amiga> +
    <Left/Right Alt> to emulate a mouse button.

    Anim-brushes may be copied or cut from an animation just  like  normal
    brushes.  In animation mode, the Define Brush tool (section 3.1.6) has
    additional options for the selection of anim-brushes.

    Just like in full-screen animations, each  frame  may  have  its  own,
    independent,  color palette. All frames share the same size and number
    of planes. Many of the brush operators, such as Resize and Rotate, can
    also be applied to anim-brushes.

    Amiga anim-brushes use a standard file format (a variation of ANIM-5),
    which is different from those normally used  by  animations.  Personal
    Paint follows this standard.


    6.8.1 Load Anim-Brush

    This command loads an anim-brush as the current brush. The  file  must
    be a valid Amiga anim-brush format.


    6.8.2 Save Anim-Brush

    This command saves the  current  anim-brush.  The  file  format  is  a
    variation  of  ANIM-5 (ANIM-5-XOR, with an interleave value of 1 and a
    DPAN chunk).


    6.8.3 Anim-Brush Settings

    Each time an anim-brush is pasted onto the image, a new frame appears.
    This requester allows the user to adjust the cycling  options  of  the
    current  anim-brush.  It  is  possible, for example, to use only every
    second frame, or to "stretch" the sequence to match an exact number of
    frames.

    The first field indicates the total number of frames.

    The  Range  string  gadgets  may be used to set the first and the last
    frame of the range used for frame cycling.

    The Length value is normally equal to the  number  of  frames  in  the
    selected  range,  but  may  adjusted  to  cover a predefined number of
    frames. If, for example, an anim-brush made of 20  frames  has  to  be
    rendered  in a sequence of only 10 animation frames, a Length value of
    10  would  cause  every  second  anim-brush  frame  to   be   skipped.
    Conversely, a Length setting of 40 would use each frame twice.

    The  Position  and  Frame  settings indicate the position of the first
    frame to be used. If the Length value is the same  as  the  number  of
    frames  in  the  range,  then  Position  and Frame will also be equal.
    Otherwise, Position indicates the  first  (current)  position  in  the
    cycling  sequence,  and  Frame  indicates the corresponding frame (the
    current frame after the requester is closed).

    For example, given a range of 20 frames from frame 4 to frame 23,  and
    a Length value of 40, a Position value of 24 would correspond to Frame
    15 (24 is divided by 2 because each frame is used twice; the resulting
    value  of 12 is offset by 3 frames so that the starting point is frame
    4).

    The Direction setting may be set to Forward, Backward,  Ping  Pong  or
    Pause.  In  Ping  Pong  mode the brush cycles back and forth, while in
    Pause mode no cycling occurs.


    6.8.4 Previous/Next Frame

    These  commands  select  the  previous  or  following frame (using the
    progression rules specified in the anim-brush settings).


    6.8.5 Free Anim-Brush

    This  command  frees  the  memory  occupied by the current anim-brush,
    leaving only the current frame as a plain brush.


    6.9 Animation and the Other Program Functions

    When  the  Clear tool (section 3.1.9) on the tool bar is selected with
    the right mouse button,  the  Clear  Frames  requester  appears.  This
    allows the user to clear (without removing) one or more frames.

    The  Image  and  Screen  Format requester (section 4.5) can be used to
    modify  the  animation  format.  Animations  can  be  stretched,  cut,
    color-reduced etc., just like an image.

    When   an  animation  is  color-reduced,  Personal  Paint  may  assign
    different palettes to the color-reduced frames, even if  the  original
    animation  only  had a single palette. This is caused by the fact that
    different frames may use different quantities of  some  colors,  which
    are  therefore  assigned  different  priorities by the color reduction
    algorithm (section 8.6). This is the best technique to convert  single
    frames,  but  seeing a common frame-background, or some objects common
    to more frames changing color from one  frame  to  the  other  may  be
    disturbing.  To  force  a  common palette (based on the palette of the
    current frame) to be used for the entire animation,  one  of  the  two
    <Shift>  keys  should  be  held  down while the "New Animation Format"
    requester is closed  (this  requester  is  followed  by  the  progress
    requester).  This  also  speeds up color reduction (which is performed
    only once). As a feedback, the "Counting  Pixels"  progress  requester
    appears.

    When  an  image  is  made  smaller  without stretching it, it is "cut"
    between the current top left corner of the screen and the  new  bottom
    right  corner  (provided that the new image format is identical to the
    new screen format). Animations can also be cut with  an  offset  other
    than  0:0.  First, the screen must be brought to the new size (without
    changing the image format). Once the screen exactly delimits the  area
    of  the  frame  to  be  preserved,  the  image format can be set to be
    identical to the screen.

    Load Image (section 4.1) normally loads the picture into  the  current
    animation  frame.  If  animation  is no longer desired, Free Animation
    must be selected before loading the picture.

    An entire animation can be copied to the other  environment  with  the
    Copy Animation command (section 4.8.<3).

    When  the Palette requester or any other palette manipulation function
    (section 7.1) are used to modify the color palette, only  the  palette
    of the current frame is changed. The Storyboard can be used to apply a
    common palette to a range of frames.


    7.1 Palette

    It  is  easy  to  forget  that it is always possible to move the mouse
    outside the requester and  pick  a  color.  In  particular,  the  full
    palette  which  appears  on the Tool Bar can be used while the palette
    requester is displayed.


    7.1.3.5 Sort Colors

    Alternate  sort  methods can be activated by holding down the <Shift>,
    <Alt> or <Ctrl> key, which respectively cause the sorting to be  based
    on  hue,  saturation or frequency. The latter option may be useful for
    PCX images, which occupy less space if  the  palette  is  arranged  in
    order of decreasing usage.


    7.2.3 Edit Stencil

    Multiple colors can be selected or  deselected  with  a  single  mouse
    click  by  dragging the mouse (with the mouse button pressed) over the
    color boxes in the the Stencil requester (just  as  in  the  tool  bar
    palette). This is especially useful with large palettes.


    8.<3 Memory Management

    If memory was unlimited, this requester would  probably  not  need  to
    exist.  In  practice,  RAM is a precious resource, and deciding how to
    make best use of  it  is  frequently  a  matter  of  compromise.  This
    requester  allows  the  user  to  adapt  Personal  Paint  to different
    requirements and configurations.


    8.<3.1 Virtual Memory

    The  Virtual  Memory settings allow the user to switch RAM and/or disk
    based virtual memory on or off. It is  also  possible  to  change  the
    minimum  amount  of memory which Personal Paint will always leave free
    on each device. The default settings need normally not be changed.  It
    is  always  a  good practice not to allow virtual memory to completely
    fill a storage device.

    Two storage locations can be used for virtual memory. One is  intended
    to  be in RAM, and one on a hard disk. RAM is usually faster, but more
    "precious", while hard disk space offers a good space/time compromise.
    Even  using a floppy disk, there would still be a clear advantage: any
    operation which activates virtual memory would  certainly  fail  if  a
    feature  like virtual memory didn't exist. From this point of view, it
    is always good to have virtual memory.

    Personal Paint tries to use RAM first. Although the RAM  storage  path
    (and  device, e.g. "RAM", "RAD" or "VD0") can be selected by the user,
    the program assumes and may require that Fast RAM  be  available.  The
    exact  behavior  depends  on the RAM device being used: "RAM" requires
    Fast RAM, "RAD" does not  (since,  unlike  others,  its  size  is  not
    dynamic).  If  the  RAM  location  does not provide enough space, disk
    storage is used.

    Virtual memory only becomes active when there is a  "memory  problem".
    Whenever  this  happens, a special "clean up" process occurs, in order
    to have only the most recently used items in Chip RAM, and  store  the
    less-used  items  in the RAM device and on disk. When an object stored
    in virtual memory needs to be displayed or processed, it is moved back
    automatically.

    Personal  Paint stores virtual memory items into separate files, which
    are deleted when they are not used  any  more,  or  when  the  program
    terminates.  These  files  can  be recognized by the ".vmem" file name
    suffix.  If  the  program  is  still  running  when  the  computer  is
    shut-down,  any  remaining  virtual  memory files are deleted when the
    program is run again. Virtual memory files can be very small, but  are
    more  likely  to  range  in  the  dozens  or  even  hundreds of Kbytes
    (otherwise, a system with a minimum of free  RAM  would  probably  not
    have required the use of virtual memory in the first place).

    When  handling virtual memory allocations, Personal Paint assumes that
    RAM is faster than the disk, also considering that it would  still  be
    better not to use virtual memory for an object subject to reuse (or at
    least, to keep it in RAM rather than on disk). The  program  therefore
    tries  to  optimize  the  combined  use  of  all resources in order to
    provide faster access to the items which are used more frequently.

    Although virtual memory is most useful  to  free  Chip  RAM,  it  also
    handles  objects  normally  stored  in Fast RAM (like animation frames
    other than the current one). The  Storyboard  undo  buffer  is  always
    placed  in  virtual  memory.  If  the undo buffer cannot be created as
    required (e.g. if virtual memory is disabled, or if there is no  space
    beyond a safe minimum) the Storyboard Cancel gadget is "ghosted".

    In  general,  hard disk space does not "breath" as dynamically as RAM.
    Unless the hard disk is always nearly full, and huge files still  have
    to  be  written  from time to time, it may even be wise to set a lower
    minimum for the hard  disk  than  for  the  RAM.  In  a  multitasking,
    RAM-dependent environment like the Amiga, leaving some free RAM may be
    more important than having free space on the hard disk.


    8.<3.2 Undo History

    The  undo  history buffer records all changes applied to the image and
    to the color palette. Even if Personal Paint is quite "intelligent" in
    deciding  how to keep a record of different types of changes, this can
    consume a lot of memory. Also, there is  normally  no  need  to  store
    actions which are very old.

    Two  program  parameters  allow  the user to set the maximum number of
    changes to be stored, and the maximum amount of memory which the  undo
    history  buffer  may  occupy.  As  the limits are exceeded, the oldest
    levels are freed.

    Regardless of these settings, Personal Paint will always try to  store
    at  least  one level of undo/redo. If the limit is explicitly set to a
    maximum of only one level (use of similarly low values is  in  general
    not  recommended),  then  Undo  and  Redo become synonymous and, as in
    other packages, can be accessed with the same Undo command.


    8.<3.3 Emergency Closing of Workbench Screen

    In  certain  extreme  conditions  of  RAM shortage, Personal Paint may
    attempt to close the Workbench screen to free some RAM (Chip or  Fast,
    depending  on  the  memory  requirement  and the system display type).
    While this is normally acceptable, Personal Paint  can  be  programmed
    not to automatically close the Workbench screen.

    Once closed, the Workbench screen can be reopened manually at any time
    (section  8.15),  and  is  reopened  automatically  when  the  program
    terminates.


    8.7.2 Pattern Dithering

    This option is almost as fast as no dithering at all, with  a  quality
    closer to that of Floyd-Steinberg dithering.

    In  particular, if the palette has only eight colors, and these colors
    are equal or similar to red, green, blue, cyan, magenta, yellow, white
    and  black, Personal Paint can use even more efficient routines, which
    better exploit the even distribution of these colors.

    Since regular dot-patterns are used, images processed with the Pattern
    Dithering  option  are  compressed  more efficiently when saved in the
    most popular file formats (compared to the more  randomly  distributed
    dots generated by the Floyd-Steinberg algorithm).


    8.7.4 Best Quality

    This  option  activates  a  set  of   professional   color   remapping
    procedures.  These are slower than the default ones, but were designed
    using very advanced algorithms, normally used only  in  the  broadcast
    industry.

    When  this  option  is off, additional speed gains can be noticed when
    there is more free memory available (up to 148 Kbytes may be used).


    8.8.6 System (ASL)

    The  File  Requester  menu  allows  the  user  to replace the standard
    Personal Paint file requester with an  ASL  (Amiga  Standard  Library)
    compatible  file requester, such as the Magic File Requester. A second
    requester appears to select the image format when  saving  a  picture,
    unless  the file name suffix indicates a file format. Depending on the
    available I/O libraries,  recognized  suffixes  could  include:  ".c",
    ".png",  ".gif",  ".iff",  ".ilbm",  ".lbm"  and  ".pcx". For example:
    "Clown.png" would automatically be saved in PNG  format,  but  in  the
    case  of  file  names  such  as  "Flower.pic"  or "Painting", a format
    selection requester would appear.


    8.9 Icons

    8.9.4 Yes (NewIcons)

    This  option is similar to the previous (Picture) one, only that it is
    intended  for  a  "NewIcons"  Workbench  environment.   The   NewIcons
    specification  defines how programs can create icons using more colors
    than the standard Workbench icons. NewIcons icons can only be seen  on
    the   Workbench  screen  if  the  appropriate  (freely  distributable)
    software extensions are installed.

    By default, Personal Paint stores  NewIcons  icons  using  a  standard
    16-color  palette.  This  creates Workbench images which are optimized
    for the NewIcons reference palette, and which are most efficient  when
    the  NewIcons  system  has  to  display  several  icons (no additional
    remapping, no palette conflicts). However, in conditions such as  true
    color  Workbench  screens,  it  may  be desirable to keep each icon as
    close as possible to the original  image  and  its  palette.  Personal
    Paint  uses up to 256 colors if the <Shift> key is held down while the
    icon is saved (i.e. just after the end  of  the  Save  Image  progress
    indicator).


    8.9.5 Original

    With this option, Workbench icons are  never  created.  When  Personal
    Paint  overwrites  a file that already has an icon, it does not change
    the existing image, but it does update the Tool Types fields. This  is
    most useful when using Personal Paint for format conversions.


    8.12 Screen

    8.12.3 Pull-Down Cycle Gadgets

    Traditional Amiga cycle gadgets do not show all options  at  the  same
    time.  They  only  allow  the  user  to "cycle" from one option to the
    other. Extensions such as "CycleToMenu" have been created to transform
    Amiga  cycle gadgets into menus which "pop-up" or can be "pulled-down"
    when a cycle gadget is selected.

    Personal Paint often has to change the colors and drawing pens used to
    create  gadgets  while  a  requester is already displayed. This is not
    supported by standard  Amiga  cycle  gadgets  or  by  the  CycleToMenu
    extensions. This menu option forces Personal Paint to render its cycle
    gadgets as if they were CycleToMenu gadgets, which appear like a  menu
    under  the gadget when the gadget is selected. The traditional cycling
    behavior is maintained if the gadget is selected on the left,  on  the
    small  cycling  symbol.  Otherwise, if the gadget is selected over the
    text, a menu is displayed.


    8.12.4 Pop-Up Cycle Gadgets

    Pop-up  menus  are  similar  to  pull-down  menus  associated to cycle
    gadgets, only that the  menu  "pops  up"  centered  over  the  current
    selection.


    8.13 Graphics

    8.13.1 Snap to Grid

    If the Grid Active option is selected, all positioning and sizing will
    snap to the intersection of the nearest two lines of a grid. The exact
    position of the (imaginary) grid and the distance  between  the  lines
    can  be  modified  by  selecting  the Snap to Grid tool with the right
    mouse button. This activates a requester where the  values  (expressed
    in pixels) can be set.

    The Offset values allow for fine positioning of the grid on each axis,
    and should range between 0 and Step-1. It is also possible to enter  a
    pixel-position  with  origin  0:0.  The  coordinates are automatically
    "normalized" to the valid range and that  point  becomes  one  of  the
    "snap points".

    Each  of  the  two  environments  may  have  its  own, different, grid
    settings.


    8.13.2 Clip Graphics

    By  default,  all  graphics  operations  may extend beyond the visible
    image limits. For example, flood-filling an entirely  blue  page  with
    white  color  would allow the white to fill even those areas which are
    beyond the screen borders.

    If this option is set, the effects of all paint and  image  processing
    functions are limited to visible screen areas.


    8.13.3 Color Average Resize

    All functions which reduce an image down to a  smaller  dimension  are
    likely  to  cause  a  loss  of  data.  The most used functions in this
    category include resizing of  brushes  and  stretching  of  images  to
    different formats.

    Since the size of the dots which make up the image is device-dependent
    and cannot be changed, the number of dots is reduced. Halving a brush,
    for  example  (section  5.10.4), reduces the number of pixels to about
    one quarter of the dots in the original brush. Even for a human, it is
    not easy to decide which dots to "sacrifice".

    If  this  option is enabled, the pixels which are sacrificed are taken
    into account when creating the destination  pixels.  A  group  of  two
    yellow  and  two  red  dots, for example, might be reduced to a single
    orange pixel. On  borders  between  highly  contrasting  colors,  this
    results in an effect also known as  anti-aliasing .

    Best  results  can  be achieved when several colors whose hue (section
    7.1.3.2) is similar to that of the original image can be used  in  the
    destination  image. For example, a black and white image (or text) can
    be reduced with excellent results if  the  destination  color  palette
    contains many different shades of gray.

    Color  average  resizing  is  more  complex  than  plain resizing, and
    therefore increases demand for processing power or execution time.


    8.13.4 Smooth Move

    Normally,  mouse  movement  messages which cannot be processed in real
    time are discarded by the Amiga operating system. When this option  is
    active,  Personal Paint allows for messages to be accumulated, so that
    tools like Continuous/Dotted Freehand and Airbrush can  process  mouse
    moves  without  loss of information. This is especially useful in very
    high resolution screens.


    8.13.5 Square Pixels

    This  option  forces  Personal Paint to override the ratio information
    provided by the Amiga Display Database, and  to  perform  all  drawing
    functions  as  if  the  pixels  were  exactly  square  (1:1).  This is
    especially useful when the current display mode uses  "almost  square"
    pixels,  which  can easily be compensated for by adjusting the monitor
    controls. When this option is active, circles, boxes and other  shapes
    drawn  by  Personal Paint are built to an exact 1:1 ratio, even if the
    current Amiga display mode would indicate otherwise.


    8.13.6 15 kHz Video

    This  option  should  be disabled if the video device connected to the
    computer cannot properly display certain video  frequencies  below  31
    kHz.

    The  original  Amiga  computers can only output a 15 kHz video signal.
    This frequency is compatible with dedicated Amiga  monitors  and  with
    television  sets,  but  it  falls  under  the  range  supported by the
    majority of computer monitors (such as VGA, SVGA and Mac). Newer Amiga
    systems  (e.g. ECS and AA chip sets) and third-party display cards can
    use video modes with frequencies of  31  kHz  and  higher,  which  are
    compatible  with industry standard monitors. These screen modes can be
    activated and added to the  list  of  available  modes  by  using  the
    corresponding Monitor files (more in section 8.3). Unfortunately, some
    15 kHz modes cannot always be disabled , as they are activated  during
    the  boot  process by the ROM code of certain Amiga models. The 15 kHz
    option can be excluded to tell Personal Paint not  to  consider  these
    modes.


    8.13.7 Amiga Blitter


    By  default,  Personal  Paint  uses the "blitter" functionality of the
    Amiga Agnus chip to speed-up certain  time-critical  procedures.  More
    recent  Amigas, however, may have CPUs (e.g. 68060, PowerPC 603) which
    are  faster  than  the  blitter.  It  is  even   possible   to   build
    Amiga-compatible  computers  (such as the DraCo) which provide blitter
    functionality through a software interface, but in which the  original
    Amiga blitter register-compatibility is missing.

    The  procedures of Personal Paint which perform such crucial functions
    are stored in external libraries. The program ships with  one  library
    that  uses  the  Amiga  blitter,  and one that uses the CPU. The first
    library only works on original  Amiga  computers  or  100%  compatible
    systems.  The  second  library is designed to work on Amiga-compatible
    systems which provide no blitter functionality, or in which the CPU is
    faster than the blitter. By default, the first (Amiga blitter) library
    is used, but if this option is disabled, or if Personal Paint  detects
    a  system  with  no  blitter (which is not always possible to detect),
    then this option should be disabled by the user. Sections 8.1 and  C.1
    (BLITLIBS  program  setting)  explain how to set this value before the
    program is started.


    8.14 Transparency

    Changing the status of this option does not change the transparency of
    brushes which were already defined.  The  transparency  plane  of  the
    current  custom  brush can be updated to the new mode by selecting the
    New  Transparency  option  (section  5.8.5).  Other  ways  of  setting
    transparent areas are described in sections 5.7.1, 5.8.6 and 5.8.7.

    Brushes which are loaded from a file always inherit their transparency
    from the associated transparency information (IFF-ILBM format). If the
    file  does not contain any transparency data, the current transparency
    mode is applied.


    8.14.1 None

    This option tells the program to ignore the current  background  color
    when  a  brush  is  defined.  With  this  setting,  brushes defined in
    Rectangular mode have no  transparency  (NO_TRANSP  flag  in  IFF-ILBM
    files),  while  in  Freehand mode the entire region outside the marked
    area is considered to be transparent.


    8.14.2 Color Transparency

    When   this  option  is  set  and  a  custom  brush  is  defined,  all
    background-colored  areas  are  marked  as  transparent   for   future
    operations.


    8.14.3 Backfill Transparency

    If   the   Backfill   Transparency   option   is   set,   only   those
    background-colored  areas  which  surround  the  brush  are  set to be
    transparent. Parts of the brush which are surrounded by  other  colors
    do not become transparent. This works a bit like "lassoing" the image.


    9.3 HP DeskJet Drivers

    New HP DeskJet drivers (result of the  joint  development  efforts  of
    Cloanto  and  Commodore),  are included on the program disk. These are
    the first versions of the drivers without the famous  RLE  compression
    bug.  The  550C driver uses black ink in addition to cyan, magenta and
    yellow, and is not bound by the previous 10 inch size-limit.  It  also
    features  improved cyan balancing code, compared to drivers previously
    released by Commodore.

    The DeskJet drivers use the Threshold value to activate a driver-local
    correction  table.  Using  Personal Paint's 24-bit printing with these
    DeskJet drivers, Threshold should remain set to 1 (=  no  correction),
    and  Density  values  of  4, 5 or 6 (which activate depletion combined
    with different levels of shingling)  are  generally  not  required.  A
    value of 7 only activates shingling, which improves print quality.

    Several  users  have  asked  whether  the  enhanced HP DeskJet drivers
    supplied with Personal Paint support 600×300 dpi graphics  output.  It
    appears  that  some owners of DeskJet 560C and DeskJet 520 were misled
    by  incomplete  information.   The   advertised   "600×300"   printing
    capabilities  of  these  models are mainly a result of RET (Resolution
    Enhancement Technology) applied to the 300×300  dpi  print  data.  The
    printers  cannot  produce  600×300 dpi color graphics, and there is no
    documented command to send black & white graphics to  the  printer  in
    600×300 dpi.


    9.4 Fonts

    Personal Paint comes  with  several  color  fonts  and  a  font  named
    "Personal.font".  All  fonts  can  be  installed  by  the installation
    procedures.

    Personal Paint and the Personal Fonts Maker Color Extensions  normally
    share the same Personal font for their user interface. The font itself
    has been upgraded a few times. On a system where different versions of
    these  programs  are installed, it may happen that one of the programs
    expects an older version of the font  to  be  available.  While  minor
    changes  are usually backwards compatible, if any characters appear to
    be incorrectly displayed it is sufficient to remove the font from  the
    system  FONTS: directory. All versions of Personal Paint and PFM2 also
    search for the font in their local  directories,  where  the  font  is
    copied during automatic installation.

    If  Topaz 8 is used for the Workbench icon texts, Personal 8 should be
    considered as a more readable replacement.


    A. Program Messages

    Animation is not possible: image larger than screen

    As  explained  in  the  introduction to animation, the animation frame
    format cannot exceed the screen limits. It may be possible to  open  a
    larger screen by choosing a different screen mode, or by activating an
    overscan mode or by enabling autoscroll.


    Animations  cannot  be  loaded  as anim-brushes Anim-Brushes cannot be
    loaded as animations

    Amiga anim-brushes use a standard file format  (described  in  section
    <6.8.2),  which  is  different  from  the  formats  normally  used  by
    animations. Furthermore,  anim-brushes  can  be  of  sizes  which  are
    incompatible  with  the  screen  modes required to display animations.
    These differences make it difficult to directly  process  anim-brushes
    by   animation  functions,  and  vice  versa.  Personal  Paint  offers
    conversion options between the two formats through ARexx scripts.

    Animations cannot be merged

    The Color Merge functions only handle images - not animations.


    Brush frames will be lost

    The  current brush is an anim-brush consisting of more than one frame.
    The anim-brush has not been saved. The selected  command  would  cause
    the loss of all frames except for the current one.


    Error in file structure

    Personal Paint recognized the file format  and  began  processing  the
    file,  but  at  some  point  the data was inconsistent with the format
    specification. For example, this could indicate improper  use  of  pad
    bytes in an IFF file.


    Error opening diskfont.library version 34 Error  opening  icon.library
    version 33

    The  specified  library does not exist, or its version number is lower
    than the one required.


    frames out of ... would be stripped

    The  Strip Frames function indicates how many frames would be removed,
    and asks for confirmation, before actually doing so.


    Image data is incomplete

    Personal Paint can now load incomplete or corrupt image files.


    Incorrect version of Personal.font

    This message usually appears only when a new version of Personal Paint
    is  run  for  the first time. It indicates that the program, searching
    for its user interface font (named  "Personal"),  found  an  incorrect
    (probably  older)  version  of  the  font.  Normally,  Personal  Paint
    searches for the font inside the "PPaint:fonts" drawer (first  choice)
    and   in   the  system  FONTS:  directory  (second  choice).  Any  old
    "Personal.font" files stored in these directories are normally updated
    automatically  by  the installation procedure. The same should be done
    in case of manual installation.  If  different  versions  of  Personal
    Paint  or  the  Personal  Fonts  Maker  need  to  be  used on the same
    computer,  and  these  programs  require  different  versions  of  the
    Personal  font,  then  the "Personal.font" file should be removed from
    the system FONTS: directory.

    This  message  may  also  be  displayed  if  a  correct   version   of
    "Personal.font" has been installed, but the old Personal font is still
    in use by the system or by  an  application.  If  this  is  the  case,
    executing  the  "Avail FLUSH" command from a Shell window or rebooting
    the system should solve the problem.

    Section 9.4 has more on the Personal font.


    Incorrect version of the user interface texts

    It  is  likely that the program has not been installed properly, since
    it has found a user interface file belonging to  a  different  program
    version.  This  may happen, for example, when testing a new version of
    the program which has not yet been installed (but another  version  of
    the program is installed).


    I/O libraries not found

    This error message indicates that Personal Paint was unable to  locate
    and  load  its  input/output  libraries (used to load and save files),
    which are normally stored in the "libs" directory placed in  the  same
    drawer  of  the  program  file.  This  could  be  caused  by  improper
    installation. PPaint normally searches for these  files  both  in  the
    local  directory  and  in  the  system  "libs" directory, and uses the
    newest libraries which are available.


    No frames to strip

    The Strip Frames function has not found any duplicate frames.


    No memory for undo

    The Storyboard would not be able to undo the  selected  operation.  If
    the  operation  is  confirmed,  the  Undo and Cancel functions will be
    disabled.


    Path incorrect

    Virtual Memory uses this message to indicate that the given path could
    not be accessed. Personal Paint attempts to create the last  directory
    of the path (usually the "t" directory), but the rest of the path name
    must refer to existing devices and drawers.


    Studio server cannot be activated

    The Studio Print mode was selected for printing, but the Studio Server
    software could not be activated. Most likely, the Studio software  was
    not installed properly, or it is an older version of the software. The
    Studio Print Server software is supported from version 2 of the Studio
    and  CanonStudio packages. Previous releases of Studio printer drivers
    can be accessed by selecting Personal Paint's "PRT"  (System  printer)
    print  mode.  In  this  case,  it may be preferable to (also) activate
    Personal Paint's own 24-bit printing routines (section 4.3.2.4).


    The animation can be viewed using "Play File"

    Some  animation  formats (e.g. some rare HAM and HAM8 files) cannot be
    loaded and edited by Personal Paint, but only played from file.


    The animation has been modified

    The animation has been modified, but not saved yet. By proceeding with
    the operation requested, it would be lost.


    The animation will be lost

    Proceeding  with the selected command would imply deleting the current
    animation.


    The drawer is not empty

    Delete was used to remove a non-empty directory.


    The filter requires a brush

    Some image processing filters use the current brush to  apply  certain
    transformations  to  the  image.  This message appears if no brush has
    been defined.


    The filter requires an additional brush

    Image processing effects such as Alpha Channel require two consecutive
    brushes.


    The filter requires two environments

    Stereograms  and  other  effects  require  two  environments (i.e. two
    images). The filters apply the changes  to  the  current  environment,
    using the other environment as a source.


    The requested display mode does not support double-buffering

    The specified display mode  does  not  support  double-buffering.  The
    introduction  to chapter 6 ("Animation") explains this in more detail.
    This warning message is displayed only once during each session with a
    given screen mode.


    UIGraphics.pic cannot be loaded


    The file containing the images used in Personal Paint's user interface
    could  not  be  loaded.  Possible  causes  include:  file  not  found,
    insufficient  memory,  file  corrupt.  When  editing  the image, it is
    important that the reference lines used to the delimit  the  areas  in
    the picture be respected and not modified. Section 1.14.


    Virtual memory settings cannot be changed

    There is not enough storage space to move the virtual  memory  objects
    which are currently in use. The changes to the virtual memory settings
    are cancelled.


    Virtual memory storage limit exceeded

    This  warning  message indicates that one or both storage devices used
    for  virtual  memory  already  have   less   free   space   than   the
    user-requested  minimum.  This  may  happen  after  changing a virtual
    memory storage device, or after increasing the minimum values.


    B. Command Shortcuts

    In program requesters not containing any text  gadgets,  the  <Return>
    and  <Esc>  keys can be used instead of the Proceed (or OK) and Cancel
    gadgets, in addition to other  keyboard  shortcuts  which  may  appear
    underlined.

    Key              Command                        Section

    <u>              Undo (One Level)               3.1.10
    <U>              Redo (One Level)               3.1.10
    <Amiga-a>        Undo All                       3.1.10
    <Amiga-A>        Redo All                       3.1.10
    <Ctrl-u>         Free Undo/Redo Buffer          3.1.10
    <Alt-Cursor>     Scroll to End                  3.2
    <Alt-j>          Copy Animation                 4.8.<3
    <@>              Project Information            4.10.1
    <0>              Storyboard...                  <6.4
    <1>              Previous Frame                 <6.6.1
    <2>              Next Frame                     <6.6.1
    <3>              Go to Frame...                 <6.6.1
    <4>              Play Continuous                <6.7
    <5>              Play Once                      <6.7
    <6>              Play Ping Pong                 <6.7
    <7>              Add One Frame                  <6.6.2
    <8>              Load Animation                 <6.1
    <9>              Save Animation                 <6.2
    <Alt-0>          Anim-Brush Settings            <6.8.3
    <Alt-1>          Previous Anim-Brush Frame      <6.8.4
    <Alt-2>          Next Anim-Brush Frame          <6.8.4
    <Alt-8>          Load Anim-Brush                <6.8.1
    <Alt-9>          Save Anim-Brush                <6.8.2


    Program Startup
    <F1> = Memory Save Mode

     Drag and Drop
    <Shift> = Play Animation (no loading)

     String Gadgets
    <Right Amiga-Return>, or
    <Right Mouse Button> = Exit string gadget (e.g. to enter a
    keyboard shortcut)

     File Requester
    <Down>/<Up> = ListView

     Font Requester
    <Down>/<Up> = ListView (font names)
    <Left>/<Right> = ListView (font size/attributes)

     Mouse Movements
    <Right Amiga-Cursor> = Accurate Move (ideal to define or position
    brushes)

     Preview
    <Space> or <Right Mouse Button> = Swap screens
    <Esc> or <Left Mouse Button> = Terminate 24-bit/HAM View Mode

     Area Settings
    <Left> = Gradient Mode (<Shift-Left> to cycle backwards)
    <Right> = Gradient Type (<Shift-Right> to cycle backwards)

     Filter Requester
    <Down>/<Up> = ListView

     Clear Frames Requester
    <Cursor Left> = Beginning of Range string gadgets
    <Cursor Right> = End of Range string gadgets

     Grab Screen
    <Down>/<Up> = ListView

     Image and Screen Format
    <Down> = Copy screen size to image size
    <Up>   = Copy image size to screen size

     Load Animation
    <Esc> = Stop Loading

     Save Animation Requester
    <Cursor Left> = Beginning of Range string gadgets
    <Cursor Right> = End of Range string gadgets

     Storyboard Requester
    <+> = Add Frames string gadgets
    <0> = Delay string gadget
    <Cursor Up> = Scroll Up gadget
    <Cursor Down> = Scroll Down gadget
    <Shift-Cursor Up> = Jump to first frame
    <Shift-Cursor Down> = Jump to last frame

     During animation
    <Left Amiga-N> = Workbench Screen to Front
    <Left Amiga-M> = Cycle to Next Screen
    <Left Amiga>+<Mouse Drag> = Drag Screen

     Play Range Requester
    <Cursor Left> = Beginning of Range string gadgets
    <Cursor Right> = End of Range string gadgets

     Anim-Brush in Animation Mode
    <Caps Lock>+<Mouse Button> = Cycle and Paste All Frames
    <Caps Lock>+<Shift>+<Mouse Button> = Cycle Backwards and Paste All
    Frames

     Color Reduction (Animation)
    <Shift> = Single Palette Mode

     Palette Requester
    <Up> = Scroll color bar to the left (keyboard autorepeat)
    <Down> = Scroll color bar to the right (keyboard autorepeat)

     Edit Stencil
    Show Stencil must be mouse-activated (no keyboard shortcuts)

     Color Statistics
    <Left> = Scroll histogram to the left (keyboard autorepeat)
    <Right> = Scroll histogram to the right (keyboard autorepeat)

     Virtual Memory Requester
    <Cursor Up> = Enable/Disable RAM storage
    <Cursor Down> = Enable/Disable Disk storage

     Save File
    <Shift> = Use up to 256 colors for Workbench icons


    C.1 Program Settings

    Program settings are global to Personal Paint. Program settings  which
    appear  in  a  settings  file  which  is  loaded  are  applied  to all
    environments.


    BLITLIBS (Virtual Blitter library - Section 8.13.7)

    BLITLIBS = "DefLibraryName", "AltLibraryName", UseDef

    DefLibraryName:   Name   of  default  library  for  blitting,  usually
    employing Amiga blitter and Chip RAM.

    AltLibraryName: Name of alternate library for blitting, which uses the
    CPU and/or a non-Amiga blitter, and might optionally replace functions
    of the graphics library  with  custom  functions  in  order  to  allow
    bitmaps to be kept in Fast RAM.

    UseDef: 0 = Try to use default library, 1 = Use alternate library.


    FILREQ (File Requester Flags - Section 8.8)

    Range: 0 .. 63. The individual values must be added: 1 = Expand  Path,
    2  =  Directories  on  Top,  4  = Sort by Date, 8 = Double-Click, 16 =
    Confirm Overwriting and 32 = ASL (system) file requester.


    FILTER (Image Processing Filters - Section 3.1.4)

    Format: FILTER = "Name", Type, <Kernel>, DivFac, Bias, BiasDX, BiasDY

    The  quoted  Name  field may contain quote and backslash signs only if
    these are preceded by a backslash sign ('\').

    Filter Types: 0 = Convolution,  1  =  Popularity,  2  =  Random,  3  =
    Dispersed  Dithering,  4  =  Clustered  Dithering, 5 = Floyd-Steinberg
    Dithering, 6 = Environment Transparency, 7 = Brush Transparency,  8  =
    Stereogram.

    Kernel:  5  blocks  (rows of the convolution matrix) of 5 values each.
    Empty fields must be set to 0. The range for each field is SHORTMIN ..
    SHORTMAX.

    DivFac  (Division  Factor) must be in the range SHORTMIN .. -1 or 1 ..
    SHORTMAX for Convolution and  1  ..  3  for  Dispersed  and  Clustered
    Dithering; the value is ignored for the other filter types.

    If  the  Type is Convolution, Bias, BiasDeltaX and BiasDeltaY are also
    considered, and should be in the range SHORTMIN .. SHORTMAX.  For  the
    Brush  Transparency  type,  Bias  values  of  -1  and  -2  are used to
    respectively indicate "Next Brush"  and  "Same  Brush"  alpha  channel
    modes.

    The following notes apply to the Stereogram Filter Type.

    A  value  of  DivFac  (Division  Factor,  range  SHORTMIN .. SHORTMAX)
    greater  than  zero  generates  SIRDS  (random  dot)  stereograms  and
    indicates  how  many  columns  are  to be created. This means that the
    pattern of random dots will be as wide as the image width  divided  by
    DivFac.  Values  of  zero or less generate SIPS stereograms, which use
    the current brush as a pattern.

    Bias (range 1 .. 16) allows the user to make some changes which affect
    the  perceived  quality  of  the stereogram. Lower quality stereograms
    (low Bias values) allow for more levels of  depth,  but  may  generate
    defects  in certain shapes (e.g. thick vertical bars may appear thin).
    Higher quality images are easier to recognize,  but  their  "flatness"
    (which  is  relative,  because  the contrast is excellent) leaves less
    room for different levels of depth.

    BiasDx (range SHORTMIN .. SHORTMAX) is used as a Random Seed for SIRDS
    in general and for SIPS with Echo suppression. Negative values cause a
    different seed to be generated  automatically  each  time  the  filter
    begins  processing. Values >= 0 allow for exact reproduction of SIRDS,
    as the patter remains constant for each single value.

    BiasDy controls different other options, which are associated  to  its
    individual  bits. The range is 0 .. 3, and the values must be added: 1
    = Help Symbols (on top of image), 2 = Echo Suppression.


    GADGETS (Cycle Gadgets - Section 8.12.3)

    0  =  Standard  Cycle Gadgets, 1 = Pull-Down Cycle Gadgets, 2 = Pop-Up
    Cycle Gadgets.


    ICONS (Workbench Icons - Section 8.9)

    0 = No, 1 = Default Icons, 2 = Picture Icons (Standard), 3 =  Preserve
    Original Icons, 4 = Picture Icons (NewIcons).


    LANG (User Interface Language - Section 8.10)

    00 = English     (.eng)
    01 = German      (.deu)
    02 = Italian     (.ita)
    03 = French      (.fra)
    04 = Spanish     (.esp)
    05 = Dutch       (.hol)
    06 = Swedish     (.swe)
    07 = Danish      (.dan)
    08 = Norwegian   (.nor)
    09 = Finnish     (.fin)
    10 = Portuguese  (.prt)
    11 = Polish      (.pol)
    12 = Hungarian   (.hun)
    13 = Czech       (.cze)
    14 = Slowak      (.svk)
    15 = Slovenian   (.svn)
    16 = Croatian    (.hrv)

    99 = Custom      (.custom)

    0xFFFFFFFF = Locale Default


     PATHANBSH   (Anim-Brush Default Path - Section <6.8)

    PATHANBSH =  "Path"


     PATHBSH   (Brush Default Path - Section 5.1)

    PATHBSH =  "Path"


     PATHSET   (Settings Requester Default Path - Section 8.1)

    PATHSET =  "Path"


     UNDOLIM   (Multi-level Undo - Sections 3.1.10 and 8.<3.2)

    UNDOLIM =  MaxLevels, MaxBuffer

    MaxLevels range: 1 .. SHORTMAX (number of Undo/Redo levels).

    MaxBuffer range: 1 .. LONGMAX (in bytes: 1 Mbyte = 1 048 576 bytes).

    MaxBuffer indicates the maximum amount of  memory  (including  virtual
    memory) which can be used to store the Undo levels (up to a maximum of
    MaxLevels Undo levels).

    Once the maximum is reached, the oldest levels are progressively freed
    to leave room for the most recent levels.

    Whatever the settings, one level of undo and redo is always guaranteed
    (even if it exceeds the memory limit set by the MaxBuffer setting).


    USE15KHZ (15 kHz Video - Section 8.13.6)

    0 = Exclude 15 kHz modes, 1 = Consider 15 kHz modes (if present).


    VIRTMEM (Virtual Memory Settings - Section 8.<3.1)

    VIRTMEM = "RAM Storage", RAM VM Enable, RAM MinFree,  "Disk  Storage",
    Disk VM Enable, Disk MinFree

    Storage: quoted storage path.

    Enable: 0 = Disabled, 1 = Enabled.

    MinFree: expressed in bytes (1 Mbyte = 1 048 576 bytes).


    WBCLOSE (Emergency Closing of Workbench Screen  -  Sections  4.11  and
    8.<3.3)

    WBCLOSE = Permission Status

    0 = Not allowed, 1 = Allowed.

    In  case  of RAM shortage, and if allowed to do so, Personal Paint may
    automatically try to close the Workbench screen to free some memory.


    C.2 Environment Settings

    Environment  settings  are  local  to  the  environment from which the
    settings file is loaded (any program settings appearing  in  the  same
    file are applied to all environments).


    ASCROLL (Autoscroll - Section 4.5.4)

    0 = No, 1 = Yes.


    DISPLAY (Amiga DisplayID - Section 4.5)

    This is the ID associated to the screen mode. Programmers may find the
    relative assignments in "graphics/displayinfo.h" (1. x and 2. x  
    include files) or in "graphics/modeid.h" (3. x includes).

    A  value  of  0xFFFFFFFF  indicates to use the same screen mode as the
    Workbench screen. This was designed with the program startup files  in
    mind. By default, Personal Paint is launched with the same screen mode
    as the Workbench, which avoids monitor flickering in combination  with
    graphics boards.


    LOCKDISP (Lock Display Mode - Section 4.5)

    LOCKDISP = Lock Activation

    0 = Unlocked, 1 = Locked.


    PATHANIM (Animation Default Path - Section <6.1)

    PATHANIM = "Path"


    PATHCOL (Color Palette Default Path - Section 7.1.1)

    PATHCOL = "Path "


    PATHPIC (Picture Default Path - Section 4.1)

    PATHPIC = "Path"


    PATHPLAY (Play Animation File Default Path - Section <6.3)

    PATHPLAY = "Path"


    PATHPS (PostScript Output Default Path - Section 4.3.3.5)

    PATHPS = "Path"


    PATHSTEN (Color Stencil Default Path - Section 7.2.1)

    PATHSTEN = "Path"


    PRINT (General Printer Settings - Section 4.3 and subsections)

    Format: PRINT = NumCopies Mode

    NumCopies may range from 1 to SHORTMAX.

    Mode: System Printer = 0, Personal Paint PostScript = 1.


    PRINTCOR (Printer Color Correction - Section 4.3.2.8)

    PRINTCOR  =    GraphType,  GrayBrightness,  GrayContrast,  GrayGamma,
    CyanBrightness,     CyanContrast,     CyanGamma,    MagentaBrightness,
    MagentaContrast,   MagentaGamma,   YellowBrightness,   YellowContrast,
    YellowGamma, BlackBrightness, BlackContrast, BlackGamma, UcrM, UcrY

    GraphType: 0 = Normal Graph, 1 = Reversed Notation.

    Brightness and Contrast range: -100 .. 100.

    Gamma range: 1000 .. 160000 (in units/10000, i.e. 0.1 .. 16.0)

    UCR range: LONGMIN .. LONGMAX (in percent/10000 - 0% = No Correction)


    RTG (Retargetable Graphics - Section 4.5.5)

    0 = No, 1 = Yes, 2 = Auto.


    SBOARD (Animation Storyboard - Section <6.4)

    SBOARD = ThumbnailWidth, Columns, Rows

    Width: In low-resolution pixels.

    Columns: Frames (thumbnail-format) per row.

    Rows: Number of thumbnail rows.


    SNAPGRID (Grid Settings - Section 8.13.1)

    SNAPGRID = XStep, YStep, XOffset, YOffset

    XStep YStep range: 1 .. SHORTMAX XOffset YOffset range: 0 .. SHORTMAX



    C.3 Read-Only Settings

    The following program settings are dedicated  to  the  more  technical
    users.  Personal Paint does not write these settings. They can only be
    inserted in a file using a text editor or a  word  processor  such  as
    Personal Write.


    ICONFMT (Icons - Section 8.9)

    ICONFMT = MaxIconWidth, MaxIconHeight, UseMaxColors, DotIcons

    Width and Height: maximum value is 93 if used to create NewIcon icons.

    UseMaxColors: 0 = Not allowed, 1 = Allowed.

    DotIcons: 0 = Standard Icon, 1 = Single-Dot Icon

    UseMaxColors is equivalent to  the  <Shift>  key  being  pressed.  The
    DotIcons  option  is useful to limit the standard Workbench icon image
    to a single pixel when NewIcons icons are generated.


    REDBITS, GREENBITS, BLUEBITS

    REDBITS = RedBits

    GREENBITS = GreenBits

    BLUEBITS = BlueBits

    Range:  0  ..  8  (0  =  Display  Mode  Default; All set to 8 = 24-bit
    palette)

    This option forces Personal Paint to use a certain number of bits  for
    each  color component in the color palette, regardless of the hardware
    being used.

    For example, to emulate the limitations of an Original Chip Set system
    on  an  AGA computer, all three values should be set to 4. Conversely,
    in order not to lose information when working with some common  12-bit
    or 18-bit hardware (e.g. ECS systems, or Picasso graphics boards), all
    three values should be set to 8.

    Interesting image processing effects can be obtained by selecting  low
    values (e.g. 1 to emulate CMYK/RGBW devices).


    THICKX, THICKY

    THICKX = HorizontalThickness

    THICKY = VerticalThickness

    These settings determine the horizontal and vertical thickness of most
    user  interface  items  (tools,  borders,  bars,  etc.)  A  value of 0
    indicates dynamic thickness (i.e. selected by the program depending on
    the  screen  size),  1  =  single thickness, 2 = double-thickness, 3 =
    quadruple-thickness, and so on. In practice, manual thickness  setting
    never  causes  objects  to appear larger than they would with with the
    option set to 0. Otherwise, some  requesters  would  not  fit  on  the
    screen.

    Range: 0 .. 128.


    E. ARexx

    Personal Paint can be controlled by external ARexx programs. The  name
    of  Personal  Paint's  ARexx  port  is  indicated  under the Workbench
    AppIcon. The name of the first port is  always  "PPaint".  A  list  of
    available  ARexx  commands is returned by Personal Paint in the RESULT
    variable when the "Help" command is issued.

    Technical documentation of ARexx commands is outside the scope of this
    manual.  Additional  developer documentation is available. Please send
    E-mail inquiries to <support@cloanto.com>, or visit  the  Cloanto  web
    site at <http://www.cloanto.com>.



    This  manual  addendum is Copyright © 1987-1996 Cloanto Italia srl. No
    part of it may be reproduced, transmitted or stored in any form or  by
    any means without the prior written permission of Cloanto. Cloanto and
    the Cloanto logo are registered trademarks,  and  ColorType,  Personal
    Paint,  Personal  Suite,  Personal  Write  and The Kara Collection are
    trademarks of Cloanto Italia srl.

